Journal of Economic Perspectives—Volume 32, Number 4—Fall 2018—Pages 3–32
An Economist’s Guide to Climate Change Science
Solomon Hsiang and Robert E. Kopp
Humans have engaged in large-scale transformation of natural systems for millennia. Stone Age hunting technologies led to extinctions of large mammals; agricultural revolutions transformed forests into farmlands; pursuit of minerals has carved the earth’s surface; dams and reservoirs now manipu- late the flow of almost all rivers; and synthetic fertilizers now flood the nitrogen cycle. But among these transformations, the restructuring of the global carbon cycle and the accompanying alteration of the climate stands apart in its sheer scale, complexity, and economic significance. Essentially all humans that have ever lived contributed, in their own small ways, to reshaping this planetary-scale system. Thou- sands of years of forest clearance may have added hundreds of billions of tons of carbon to the atmosphere. In the industrial era, every home lit by a coal or natural gas-fired power plant and every petroleum-powered train, plane, and motor vehicle has contributed to the net accumulation of carbon dioxide in the atmosphere. The average human contributes about 5 tonnes of carbon dioxide (CO2) every year (Le Quéré et al. 2018), about a quarter of which will remain in the atmosphere for well over a millennium (Archer et al. 2009).
■ Solomon Hsiang is Chancellor’s Associate Professor of Public Policy, University of Cali- fornia, Berkeley, California, and is a Research Associate, National Bureau of Economic Research, Cambridge, Massachusetts. Robert E. Kopp is Director of the Institute of Earth, Ocean & Atmospheric Sciences and Professor of Earth & Planetary Sciences, both at Rutgers University, New Brunswick, New Jersey. Hsiang and Kopp are both Principal Investigators, Climate Impact Lab, http://www.impactlab.org. Their email addresses are shsiang@berkeley. edu and robert.kopp@rutgers.edu.
† For supplementary materials such as appendices, datasets, and author disclosure statements, see the article page at
https://doi.org/10.1257/jep.32.4.3 doi=10.1257/jep.32.4.3
 
4 Journal of Economic Perspectives
Those emissions of CO2, together with other greenhouse gases, distort the planet’s energy balance. In steady state, the sunlight that makes it to the Earth’s surface is absorbed and then re-radiated to space as an equal quantity of heat (tech- nically, infrared light). The accumulation of greenhouse gases in the atmosphere blocks some of this re-radiation, redirecting energy back toward the Earth’s surface: about 27 trillion watts (0.05 watts per square meter) per 1 percent increase in atmo- spheric CO2 concentrations, equivalent to the energy of one Hiroshima-scale atomic bomb spread over the surface of the Earth every 2.3 seconds. The resulting climatic distortion affects not just temperatures around the world, but also where clouds form, when it floods, how cyclones move, and the volume of water in the ocean. Thus, while fossil-fueled human industriousness has raised unprecedented multi- tudes out of poverty, the scale of the climate change externality it has produced is similarly extraordinary.
At least since Nordhaus’s (1977) presentation at an American Economic Asso- ciation annual meeting, the analysis and management of climate change has been recognized as an important economic problem, and a growing number of econ- omists are lending the world their expertise in understanding the problem and developing solutions. However, conversations with colleagues indicate to us that a general discomfort with physical sciences—a subject sometimes not studied since high school—prevents many economic minds from engaging more deeply with the problem of climate change.
The goal of this article is to provide a brief introduction to the physical science of climate change, aimed towards economists. We begin by describing the physics that controls global climate, how scientists measure and model the climate system, and the magnitude of human-caused emissions of carbon dioxide. We then summarize many of the climatic changes of interest to economists that have been documented and that are projected in the future. We conclude by highlighting some key areas in which economists are in a unique position to help climate science advance. An important message from this final section, which we believe is deeply underappreciated among economists and thus highlight here, is that all climate change forecasts rely heavily and directly on economic forecasts for the world. On timescales of a half-century or longer, the largest source of uncertainty in climate science is not physics, but economics (Hawkins and Sutton 2009).
Basics of Climate Change Science
For most economic and scientific purposes, climate can be defined as the joint probability distribution describing the state of the atmosphere, ocean, and freshwater systems (including ice). Each of these systems is itself an extraordinarily high-dimensional system, so it is appealing to work with summary statistics such as global mean surface temperature or temperature distributions for major cities. Indeed, global mean surface temperature is intimately tied to the fundamental physics of planetary energy balance that explain global warming. However, consumers of

climate science should recognize that such simplifications, while sometimes useful, do not capture the entire picture.
The idea that human activity could alter the climate has a long history, going back almost two centuries (for an overview, see Weart 2018). However, it took focused research during the second half of the 20th century to achieve the level of confidence we now possess that human activity is altering the climate (Stocker et al. 2013; US Global Change Research Program 2017). This confidence comes from many lines of evidence based on observations at Earth’s surface and throughout different layers of the atmosphere and oceans, geological reconstructions of histor- ical climates, and two centuries of physical theory. The null hypothesis that humans have had no influence on global climate is now easily rejected given available data (for example, Hegerl et al. 2007).
Planetary Energy Balance and Greenhouse Gases
Sunlight continuously enters our planet’s atmosphere from space. In order for the earth to maintain a stable surface temperature, this flow of incoming energy must be balanced by a flow of energy leaving the atmosphere. For the Earth, about 30 percent of incident sunlight is immediately reflected back out to space from the surface or from clouds. The remaining 70 percent is absorbed by the Earth’s surface and atmosphere, and must be balanced by the planet’s own emission of infrared radi- ation to space, which intensifies with higher temperatures. Without greenhouse gases, the equilibrium global mean surface temperature would be –18°C (about 0°F)1, fully determined by the Sun’s temperature, the Earth’s distance from the Sun, and the reflectivity (also known as “albedo”) of the Earth. If a larger flow of energy somehow were to reach the Earth’s surface—for example, if the Sun were to grow in bright- ness, or the Earth to decline in albedo—the planet would heat up until the additional outgoing flow of infrared radiation exactly offset this new source of energy.
Greenhouse gases distort Earth’s energy balance because they are transparent to incoming visible and ultraviolet sunlight but absorb infrared radiation, hindering the return flow of this energy from the surface and the lower atmosphere into space. When a greenhouse gas molecule intercepts infrared radiation headed from the surface to space, the absorbed energy is re-emitted in all directions, sending some energy that might otherwise have escaped to space back down to the surface of the Earth. This causes the surface and lower atmosphere to warm, increasing their emission of infrared radiation slightly. Equilibrium is re-established when the intensified outgoing infrared radiation is sufficient to offset the trapping effects of the greenhouse gases.
Because of the presence of greenhouse gases, the average height in the atmosphere from which infrared radiation can escape to space and contribute to balancing the planet’s energy budget is not the Earth’s surface; it is a level of the atmosphere known as the “effective radiating level.” At present, Earth’s effective
1 To convert any temperature change from Celsius to Fahrenheit, multiply by nine-fifths—so 2°C of warming is 2 × 9/5 = 3.6°F of warming. To convert a temperature in levels from Celsius to Fahrenheit, multiply by nine-fifths and then add 32—thus a day with level temperature of 30°C = 30 × 9/5 + 32 = 86°F.
Solomon Hsiang and Robert E. Kopp 5

6 Journal of Economic Perspectives
radiating level occurs at about 5.5 km altitude; on average, this level has the necessary temperature of about –18°C—the same that the Earth’s surface would have in the absence of greenhouse gases. The relationship between temperature and altitude in Earth’s lower atmosphere—on average about 6°C/km—makes the surface nearly 33°C (about 59°F) warmer than this level.
When greenhouse gases are added to the atmosphere, the first reaction is that the height of the effective radiating level moves upward. This temporarily leads to a decrease in the amount of radiation escaping from the Earth to space; but conservation of energy implies the surface and lower atmosphere must then warm up, so the higher (and originally cooler) effective radiating level would warm to the equilibrium temperature of –18°C. In the absence of additional feedbacks, doubling carbon dioxide concentrations would lead to the effective radiating level being about 200 meters higher, which in turn would lead to an equilibrium surface warming of about 1.2°C (Hansen et al. 1981).
However, the warming surface and atmosphere trigger feedbacks, which change the shift in effective radiating level and surface temperature associated with a given change in greenhouse gas concentration. Estimates of equilibrium climate sensi- tivity (the long-term, equilibrium response to a doubling of CO2 concentrations) that include atmospheric and sea ice feedbacks are generally 2.0–4.5°C (3.6–8.1°F) (Collins, Knutti et al. 2013). The most important feedback involves water vapor: a warmer atmosphere is a more humid atmosphere, and water vapor is the most powerful natural absorber of longwave infrared radiation. Other important feed- backs involve sea ice (which reflects incoming solar energy), clouds (which can both trap heat and reflect incoming solar energy), and the response to warming of the ocean and land ecosystems (which drive most of the flow of CO2 out of the atmo- sphere and can also affect albedo).
Because greenhouse gases alter the climate by changing the radiative proper- ties of the atmosphere, their influence is measured in units of “radiative forcing,” defined as the extent to which the human-generated stock of gas distorts the net flow of radiation into the atmosphere on average (incoming minus outgoing), relative to a preindustrial baseline. For example, a rise in atmospheric CO2 concentrations from the historical baseline of 278 parts per million to the current (as of 2018) level of 409 parts per million exerts about 2.1 W/m2 of radiative forcing. For reference, the energy from the sun reaching the top of Earth’s atmosphere is 342 W/m2, and central estimates of the equilibrium warming associated with a change in radiative forcing are about 0.8°C per W/m2; thus the equilibrium warming associated with the current level of CO2 forcing is about 1.6°C above the preindustrial baseline.
Radiative forcing by greenhouse gas emissions does not translate immediately into surface warming, in part because the deep ocean takes centuries to warm and, through exchange of heat with the surface ocean, slows overall warming. Nonetheless, modeling experiments indicate that—because of the relative timescales over which the planet warms and CO2 is naturally removed from the atmosphere—most of the warming associated with a marginal emission of CO2 occurs within a couple decades and persists for millennia ( Joos et al. 2013). Thus, climatic changes experienced today are a result of both relatively recent emissions

An Economist’s Guide to Climate Change Science 7
and also cumulative emissions during the past centuries of fossil fuel combustion and past millennia of deforestation.
Establishing Baseline Climates
Within climate science, paleoclimatology is a well-developed subfield that focuses on the reconstruction of historical climates, thus setting a baseline for explaining climate changes. For examples, gases trapped in air bubbles of ice contain infor- mation on atmospheric chemistry at the moment they froze (for example, Luthi et al. 2008); the width of tree rings reflect growing-season temperatures and rain- fall (for example, Jones et al. 2009); microscopic fossils in salt-marsh sediments reflect changes in salinity, and thus in local sea level (for example, Edwards and Horton 2000); and the relative abundance of different isotopes of oxygen in ocean sediments reflect the extent of “ice ages” because polar ice sheets lock up lighter isotopes, thereby restricting their supply to the deep ocean (for example, Cramer, Miller, Barrett, and Wright 2011). In some cases, physical data can be corroborated with observations in historical records, such as records of cyclone-caused shipwrecks maintained by insurers (Trouet, Harley, and Domínguez-Delmás 2016). While most proxies and historical observations are inherently local, spatio-temporal statistical methods and comparison to physical models can be used to estimate global mean values of quantities such as surface temperature and sea level from local data.
Figure 1 presents reconstructions of atmospheric CO2 concentrations, global mean surface temperature, and global mean sea level over two different timescales. In the context of the last 11,600 years, known as the Holocene Epoch, the recent sharp jump in atmospheric CO2 concentrations is quite striking and is unequivo- cally explained by human-caused emissions (Luthi et al. 2008; MacFarling Meure et al. 2006). The higher-resolution, post-1958 observational record from Mauna Loa in Hawaii also reflects higher-frequency patterns of largely natural variability, like the seasonal cycle and inter-annual variability in the strength of the land and ocean carbon sink (Keeling et al. 2001). The Holocene temperature record reveals a long-term decline, caused by slow variations in Earth’s orbit, that began around 5,500 years ago (Marcott, Shakun, Clark, and Mix 2013).2 The post-1850 reconstruction from direct observations reveals that this decline was interrupted in the 20th century, by a rise totaling about 1.0°C from the late-19th to the early-21st century (Rohde et al. 2013). This rise, which is superimposed by a spectrum of
2 The exact timing of the Holocene decline is currently contested. Marsicek, Shuman, Bartlein, Shafer, and Brewer (2018) suggest that the global analysis underlying Figure 1 is seasonally biased and conceals a more complex pattern, at least in North America and Europe, where their analysis suggests that summer temperatures declined starting around 5,500 years ago, but that winter temperatures did not cool until about 2,000 years ago. Some other, very long term cycles include Milankovic ́ cycles, which are global periodic climate changes driven by variations in the orientation of Earth’s axis of rotation (19,000- and 23,000-year periods), the tilt of Earth’s axis of rotation (41,000-year periods), and the shape of Earth’s orbit around the Sun (roughly 100,000- and 400,000-year periods) (Berger 2012). Changes in incoming solar radiation caused by these cycles, amplified by natural feedbacks, serve as the pacemaker for ice ages over the last 2.6 million years.

8 Journal of Economic Perspectives
Figure 1
Atmospheric CO2 Concentrations, Global-Mean Surface Temperature, and Global- Mean Sea Level
 400
 350
 300
 250
0.8 0.4 0 –0.4
0 –20 –40 –60
10 8 6 4 2 0 Thousands of years ago
10 8 6 4 2 0 Thousands of years ago
10 8 6 4 2 0 Thousands of years ago
400 350 300
1850 1900 1950 2000 Year CE
1
0 –1
1850 1900 1950 2000 Year CE
10 0 -10
1850 1900 1950 2000 Year CE
Data: Luthi et al. (2008); MacFarling Meure et al. (2006); Keeling et al. (2001); Marcott, Shakun, Clark, and Mix (2013); Rohde et al. (2013); Lambeck, Rouby, Purcell, Sun, and Sambridge (2014); Kopp, Kemp et al. (2016); Hay, Morrow, Kopp, and Mitrovica (2015); Beckley et al. (2016).
Note: The figure shows historical atmospheric CO2 concentrations from ice cores and direct measurements (top), reconstructed historical global mean surface temperatures relative to the 1850–1900 average (middle), and reconstructed global mean sea level relative to the 1991–2009 average (bottom), over the last 11,000 years (left) and since 1850 CE (right). Shaded areas are 95 percent confidence intervals.
higher-frequency variability, some internal to the climate system and some driven by changes in forcing, is well-explained by the response to human-caused emissions. Sea level responds more sluggishly than temperature to changes in forcing, because both the oceans (which expand when they absorb heat) and ice sheets (which can shrink in response to warming temperature) are large systems with an ability to absorb tremendous quantities of heat while warming only modestly. The first half of the Holocene is characterized by relatively rapid sea-level rise, which
        MacFarling Meure et al. 2006 Keeling et al. 2001
 Luthi et al. 2008
MacFarling Meure et al. 2006 Keeling et al. 2001
     Marcott et al. 2013
 Rohde et al. 2013
      Global mean sea-level rise (cm)
Surface temperature change (C°)
CO2 concentration (parts per million)
Global mean sea-level rise (cm)
Surface temperature change (C°)
CO2 concentration (parts per million)
 Kopp et al. 2016 Hay et al. 2015 Beckley et al. 2016
 Lambeck et al. 2014

ended with the final disappearance of Laurentide Ice Sheet in North America. This rise was a delayed response to about 5°C warming since the thermal nadir of the last ice age (about 21,000 years). The twentieth-century sea-level rise was the fastest in at least 2,800 years, and the last quarter-century was characterized by a rate about twice as fast as the 20th century average (Sweet, Horton, Kopp, LeGrande, and Romanou 2017).
In general, a core challenge to determining whether humans are changing the climate is assessing whether systematic changes in the behavior of the climate system are explained or confounded by the sources of natural variation. As one example of such natural variation, El Niño–Southern Oscillation is the dominant pattern in the global climate at annual frequencies and has occasionally been studied by economists (for example, Hsiang and Meng 2015). Other longer-term ocean-related oscillations include the North Atlantic Oscillation, which varies on seasonal, annual, decadal, and centennial timescales (Hurrell 1995; Trouet, Scourse, and Raible 2012); the Pacific Decadal Oscillation (Mantua and Hare 2002); and the Atlantic Multidecadal Oscillation (Clement et al. 2015). Climate models form the basis for inference in this setting, seeking to separate a secular trend signal from these oscillating sources of noise.
Climate Models
Climate models mathematically represent physical understanding of the climate system. They fall along a hierarchy of complexity from simple models that capture key aspects of the longer-term, global-scale response to detailed, full-complexity Earth system models that provide greater insight into processes at finer temporal and spatial scales (Hayhoe et al. 2017).
The simplest climate change models, called energy balance models, can simu- late millennia of global mean climate change in a single second on a laptop. These models are based on a budgeting of sunlight and thermal energy in the atmosphere, as well as the role of key feedbacks. Early pen-and-paper versions of such models date back to the work of Svante Arrhenius in the 1890s; by the 1960s, they had also been adapted to include a single spatial dimension representing the vertical struc- ture of the atmosphere, which allowed the models to describe vertical motions of air (Manabe and Strickler 1964).
In the 1960s, the equations of fluid dynamics were incorporated to produce early atmospheric “general circulation models” that capture both the three-dimensional structure and dynamical evolution of the global atmosphere (for example, Manabe and Smagorinsky 1965). Later generations of models elaborated their representa- tion of the ocean, as well as of sea ice, land surfaces, and atmospheric chemistry. These general circulation models3 were the ancestors of today’s full-complexity Earth system models, which also endogenize vegetation dynamics and the carbon cycle. Full-complexity Earth system models represent the best tools available for simulating spatial patterns of the climate response, but they have several drawbacks.
3 As general circulation models evolved to include more than just the fluid dynamics of the ocean and the atmosphere, the acronym GCM was sometimes adapted to stand for “global climate model.”
Solomon Hsiang and Robert E. Kopp 9

10 Journal of Economic Perspectives
First, they are computationally expensive, taking several hours on a high-performance computing cluster just to simulate one year of climate. Second, although such models provide fairly high spatial resolution—with grid cells that are roughly 100 km along a side in the generation of models used in the Fifth Assess- ment Report of the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change (IPCC)—this resolution may still be inadequate for capturing details relevant to many economic impacts. Third, detailed models may produce baseline climate projections that differ from observed historical patterns. To address these last two issues, the climate science community has developed post-processing techniques for bias-correction and spatial “downscaling,” thus increasing the spatial resolution of the final output. Such techniques include both statistical approaches (like using quantile regressions to mimic historical variability around the mean) and physical modeling approaches that embed higher-resolution regional climate models within boundary conditions set by a global model (as in Wood, Leung, Sridhar, and Lettenmaier 2004). In addi- tion, cutting-edge climate models are run at increasingly higher resolutions; some of the most recent models have resolutions below 50 km × 50 km, and in some cases can achieve local resolutions as high as 10 km × 10 km.
Within the context of a single climate model simulation, uncertainty arises from the imperfect representation of physical processes—that is, from structural and parametric uncertainty—as well as from the imperfectly known initial conditions of a model run. As famously discovered by Lorenz (1963) in early numerical weather models, tiny errors in initial conditions can produce dramatically different fore- casts within the same model, chaotic behavior known colloquially as “the butterfly effect.” This endogenous chaotic behavior turns out to be more difficult to predict than global average conditions, which are tightly constrained by energy budgets. As a result, climate modeling teams usually run their model multiple times with perturbed initial conditions, creating a collection of results known as an initial-conditions ensemble. Individual realizations of the model are never interpreted as literal fore- casts; rather, the ensemble as a whole is thought to capture statistical properties of the climate system. Indeed, most climate scientists generally avoid the terms “forecast” and “prediction,” preferring instead the term “projection” to describe a simulation of future climate under an assumed emission scenario. Producing decadal projections with global climate models is a frontier research area, with one of the key challenges being aligning the internal variability of a climate model with the internal variability of the real climate (Meehl et al. 2009).
Emissions of Radiative Pollutants
Not all the greenhouse gases emitted by humans remain in the atmosphere today; a substantial fraction has been absorbed by carbon sinks on land (like plants and soil) and in the ocean (for example, by phytoplankton and chemical dissolu- tion). If all 1434 Gt of fossil CO2 emitted since 1750 had stayed in the atmosphere, the current atmospheric CO2 concentration would be about 475 ppm rather than the observed 409 ppm, even without considering emissions from deforestation.4
4 One part-per-million CO2 in the atmosphere is equal to about 7.8 Gt CO2 in physical mass.

An Economist’s Guide to Climate Change Science 11
Table 1
Historical and Top 15 Current Emissions of Carbon Dioxide from Fossil Fuel Combustion and Cement Production
  Cumulative
1751–2014 Country (gigatonnes CO2)
China 174.7 United States 375.9 India 41.7
% of Global
12%
26%
3% 11% 4% 6% 1% 1% 1% 2% 1% 1% 1% 1% 5%
Emissions 2014 (gigatonnes CO2)
10.3 5.3 2.2 1.7 1.2 0.7 0.6 0.6 0.6 0.5 0.5 0.5 0.5 0.5 0.4
% of Global
30% 15% 7% 5% 4% 2% 2% 2% 2% 2% 2% 1% 1% 1% 1%
100%
Emissions per capita (tonnes CO2), 2014
7.5 16.2 1.7 11.9 9.6 8.9 8.3 19.5 11.7 15.1 2.6 9.1 3.8 1.8 6.5
4.7
 Russia / USSR Japan Germany
Iran
Saudi Arabia South Korea Canada Brazil
South Africa Mexico Indonesia United Kingdom
World
151.3 53.5 86.5 14.8 12.0 14.0 29.5 12.9 18.4 17.5 11.0 75.2
1,434.0 100% 34.1
 Source: Boden, Marland, and Andres (2017).
However, cumulative emissions of CO2 are nonetheless a useful metric, as the CO2-caused warming is approximately proportional to cumulative emissions (Allen et al. 2009), with every trillion tons of CO2 causing about 0.2–0.7°C of warming.
Table 1 presents the estimated cumulative emissions of CO2 from fossil fuels and cement production during 1751–2014, as well as the flow of emissions in 2014 (Boden, Marland, and Andres 2017). The United States is responsible for over one-fourth of historical emissions, followed by China (12 percent) and Russia (11 percent, including the former Soviet Union); together with Germany (6 percent) and the United Kingdom (5 percent), these five countries account for 60 percent of historical emissions. However, if one examines flows today rather than the stock of historical emissions, the picture is changing; China (30 percent) dominated emissions in 2014, followed by the United States (15 percent), India (7 percent), Russia (5 percent), and Japan (4 percent). Germany is the largest emitter in the European Union (2.1 percent), with the EU28 collectively ranking third in global CO2 emissions, responsible for about 10 percent (Janssens-Maenhout et al. 2017). High national emissions reflect high carbon intensity per capita (per-capita emissions are 16.2 tonnes/year in the United States, 3.4 times the global average), high population levels (per capita emissions in India, the third-leading emitter, are about one-third the global average), or a mix of both factors (per-capita emissions in China are about 60 percent more than the global average).
These metrics do not include CO2 emissions from deforestation, which are significant: Pongratz and Caldeira (2012) estimate that these accounted for about

12 Journal of Economic Perspectives
230 gigatonnes of CO2 from 800–1850, and 425 gigatonnes of CO2 from 800–2006, compared to about 1,175 gigatonnes of CO2 from fossil fuels over this latter time period (Boden, Marland, and Andres 2017). At present, the ratio of fossil fuel to land use emissions is about 7.6 (Le Quéré et al. 2018).
These metrics also do not include emissions of non-CO2 greenhouse gases and other climate-altering pollutants. The climatic impact of an emission depends on both its radiative forcing of the molecules emitted and their lifetime in the atmosphere. For example, methane survives for only 12 years on average in the atmosphere before breaking down into CO2 and water, whereas a substantial frac- tion of emitted CO2 lasts for millennia. Thus, while methane has large radiative impact per molecule per year, the integrated lifetime impact of a marginal molecule of methane emissions is partially offset by its short lifetime.5 Blanco et al. (2014) provide a discussion of non-CO2 emissions.
Emissions of particulate matter and aerosol precursors (like sulfur dioxide) also influence the radiative balance of the atmosphere. Both pollutants lead to the formation of aerosols—particles that are solid or liquid, not gases, but which are small enough to remain aloft in the atmosphere for substantial periods of time (days in the lower atmosphere; years in the stratosphere). Most aerosols reflect incoming sunlight, leading to surface cooling (negative radiative forcing), but some, notably black carbon, absorb solar energy and increase warming. Through their effects on cloud physics, aerosol emissions have complex regional consequences for precipita- tion that are distinct from the effects of greenhouse gases (Rosenfeld et al. 2008). Because the spatial distribution and net radiative effects of aerosols are difficult to monitor, and change more quickly than gases, the overall radiative impact of aero- sols is highly uncertain and remains an important open question in climate change science. The global average effective radiative forcing of aerosols is estimated to be between –1.9 and –0.1 W/m2—opposite in sign and between about 5 percent and 90 percent of the forcing from CO2 (Boucher et al. 2013).
As one more level of complexity, coal combustion emits both CO2 and aerosol pollution, which leads to a tradeoff of timescales: burning less coal reduces partic- ulate matter and sulfur dioxide emissions which is directly beneficial to human health, but also leads to a short-term increase in warming due to the reduction in aerosol emissions, even though the long-term effect of reduced CO2 emissions is a substantial reduction in warming (Wigley 2011). Similarly, efforts to target reduc- tions in particulate pollution from coal power plants without tackling CO2 emissions will lead to climate warming (Westervelt et al. 2015).
Emissions Scenarios
There are many climate modeling research programs, each of which develop, maintain, and run global climate models whose outputs are compared against one
5 Methane, with an atmospheric concentration of about 1.8 ppm, currently exerts a forcing of about 0.5 W/m2; nitrous oxide, at 0.3 ppm, exerts a forcing of about 0.2 W/m2, and fluorinated gases like chlorofluorocarbons and hydrofluorocarbons, with concentrations less than 1 part per billion, exert forcing of about 0.3 W/m2.

another. The Coupled Model Intercomparison Project (CMIP) (Taylor, Stouffer, and Meehl 2012) is the largest comparative effort, and plays a major role in informing the assessment reports of the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change. To ensure that model outputs are comparable across groups, standardized emissions scenarios are used as inputs to all models. The latest effort, CMIP Phase 5 (CMIP5), used a range of emission scenarios, known as the Representative Concentration Pathways (RCPs), that exogenously prescribe the flow of human-caused emissions over the coming decades. These emissions scenarios, which begin in 2005, are labeled by the overall radiative forcing (in W/m2) that occurs in 2100 in each scenario. RCP 8.5 has the strongest forcing, with CO2 emissions nearly doubling from their current levels by 2050 and continuing to rise thereafter; RCP 4.5 has a moderate forcing, with CO2 emissions stabilizing at close to their current levels through the middle of the century and declining thereafter, reaching about 40% of their current levels by 2080; and RCP 2.6 has the weakest forcing, with CO2 emissions declining immediately, to less than a third of the current levels by 2050, and becoming net-negative during the 2080s. In RCP 8.5, atmospheric CO2 concentration climbs to 541 ppm by 2050 and 936 ppm by 2100; in RCP 4.5, to 487 ppm by 2050 and 538 ppm by 2100; and in RCP 2.6, to 443 by 2050, declining to 421 ppm by 2100. Below, when we discuss “high-”, “moderate-” and “low-” emissions scenarios, we are referring to RCP 8.5, 4.5, and 2.6, respectively.
Observed and Projected Climate Changes in the Modern World
In this section, we describe how historical changes in the climate are identified and attributed to human activity, as well as climate changes that are projected to occur. Interested readers should consult the IPCC Fifth Assessment Report (Stocker et al. 2013), USGCRP (2017), and the readings cited below for additional details.
Detection and Attribution of Climate Change
Over the last several decades, a core objective of climate science has been to detect changes in the climate and to determine whether these changes can be attrib- uted to human activity. Detection refers to the empirical problem of determining whether there has been an actual shift in the joint distribution of environmental variables that we refer to as the climate. Attribution refers to the inferential problem of assigning a cause to the observed changes (Bindoff et al. 2013). Attribution studies generally simulate what counterfactual climates would look like in the absence of human activity, altering the model parameters that describe human inputs to the climate. Thus, for example, human emissions of greenhouse gases and aerosols might be eliminated in a model’s “control” simulation. If it is not possible, or sufficiently unlikely, that these human-free simulations can account for observed changes in the climate, then scientists attribute these changes to human activity.
The scientific community is in broad and strong agreement that overall, human activity has already substantially altered the global climate and that continued changes should be expected as emissions of greenhouse gases continue (Stocker et al. 2013; USGCRP 2017). The vast majority of actively publishing researchers now acknowledge
Solomon Hsiang and Robert E. Kopp 13

14 Journal of Economic Perspectives
Table 2
Statements of the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change (IPCC) on Detection and Attribution of Global Climate Change
  First Assessment Report (1990) Second Assessment Report (1995) Third Assessment Report (2001) Fourth Assessment Report (2007)
Fifth Assessment Report (2013)
“Unequivocal detection of the enhanced greenhouse effect from observations is not likely for a decade or more.”
“The balance of evidence suggests a discernible human influence on global climate.”
“Most of the observed warming over the last 50 years is likely* to have been due to the increase in greenhouse gas concentration.”
“Most of the observed increase in global average temperatures since the mid-20th century is very likely due to the observed increase in anthropogenic greenhouse gas concentrations.”
“It is extremely likely that human influence has been the dominant cause of the observed warming since the mid-20th century.”
  Source: The IPCC Assessment Reports can be found at https://www.ipcc.ch/publications_and_data/ publications_and_data_reports.shtml.
* The uncertainty language used by the IPCC is precisely defined: likely refers to an assessed probability of at least 66 percent, very likely implies at least 90 percent, and extremely likely means at least 95 percent.
the strength of the evidence implicating a human-caused signal in climate change (Cook et al. 2016). The agreement in the scientific community has grown stronger over the last quarter century, reflected in the IPCC’s increasingly strong statements regarding the detection and attribution of global warming shown in Table 2. Some of the public confusion regarding the strength of scientific evidence appears to have been sown intentionally. For example, a textual analysis of ExxonMobil docu- ments from 1977–2014 indicates that internal documents generally acknowledged that climate change is real and human caused while public-facing documents did not (Supran and Oreskes 2017).
Figure 2 (which is best viewed in the color version of this article available at the JEP website) shows some of the most important evidence in support of the conclusion that human emissions are causing global temperatures to rise. In the left panel, red [or upper light grey] bands indicate the range of global mean surface temperature simulated in 90 percent of climate models that exogenously impose observed human emissions. Blue [or lower light grey] bands indicate the analo- gous range for the same models but in a “control” simulation that imposes only natural forces. Observed temperatures, indicated by the black line, began to sepa- rate from the envelope of control simulations in the 1980s and now lie far outside this range. In contrast, observed temperatures are fully consistent with the range of temperatures simulated when human emissions are included. We note that this consistency extends not just to global mean surface temperature, but also to changes in stratospheric temperature and ocean heat content. Thus, it is extremely difficult to explain current temperatures in the absence of human activity. The

 )C ̊)C ̊ (( Models including greenhouse
.p.p gas emissions from humans
mm 3 et et (90% range)
1.5
ecaeca 2 frfr 1
us us Observations
nn aa 0.5
1 em em lala 00 bolbol gg nn –0.5
Control runs with –1 ie ie only natural emissions
gnagna 1900 1950 2000
hChC
Model projections in moderate emissions scenario (90% range shaded)
An Economist’s Guide to Climate Change Science 15
Figure 2
Average Annual Global Mean Surface Temperature, Compared to Distributions of Climate Model Simulations
Sources: Data comes from Jones, Stott, and Christidis (2013), Morice, Kennedy, Rayner, and Jones (2012), and Taylor, Stouffer, and Meehl (2012).
Note: This graph is best viewed in color; the electronic version of this article available at the JEP website is in color. The heavy black line shows observed average annual global mean surface temperature. The red [or light grey] distributions are exogenously “treated” with anthropogenic greenhouse gas emissions, while the blue [or light grey] distributions (shown only in the left panel) are “control” runs that only contain natural forcings. In the left panel, climate model distributions are from the Third Coupled Model Intercomparison Project (CMIP3) published in 2007 and displayed until 2000, and CMIP5 published in 2013 and displayed until 2010. In the right panel, all climate model projections come from CMIP5 in the moderate emissions scenario (RCP 4.5). Temperatures shown are relative to the 1880–1900 average.
gradually increasing confidence of the scientific community can be understood by noting the envelope of model results published in association with the 2007 IPCC report (displayed ending in simulation year 2000) were less cleanly separated than those published in association with the 2013 IPCC report (displayed ending in 2010), although the separation visible through 2000 was already reflected in the IPCC’s 2007 statement that temperatures were “very likely due to anthropogenic greenhouse gas concentrations” (Table 2).
It is now virtually certain (at least 99 percent probability) that the observed modern warming trend exceeds the bounds of natural variability (Bindoff et al. 2013). Furthermore, humans are likely (with at least 66 percent probability) respon- sible for 0.6°C–0.8°C of the observed 0.6°C of warming over 1951–2010. Values greater than 0.6°C are possible for the anthropogenic contribution because of the possibility that natural forcing and variability could otherwise impose a slightly negative baseline trend (for example, as a result of volcanic eruptions), a pattern which is visible in the control runs of Figure 2.
1900 1950
Observations
2000 2050 2100

16 Journal of Economic Perspectives
Temperature Changes
Since the late 19th century, global mean surface temperature has increased by about 1.0°C, with the trend accelerating after 1980. Almost every location on the planet has exhibited an upward temperature trend over this period (Wuebbles et al. 2017). Warming has also been substantially faster over land than the ocean— between 1880–1900 and 1997–2017, the land has warmed 1.4°C (2.5°F) on average while the oceans warmed roughly 0.6°C (1.1°F) (GISTEMP Team 2018).
As one would expect, given the array of factors affecting temperatures, the overall rise in temperatures has not been smooth over time or homogenous across space. For example, warming was dampened in the 1950s–1970s, most likely as a result of both aerosol emissions, which reflected sunlight away from the planet (Maher, Gupta, and England 2014), and natural variability. Since 1980, the most rapid warming has occurred in the far north, where the replacement of highly reflective summer sea ice with dark, open ocean rapidly increases the absorption of sunlight and local warming (Serreze and Barry 2011).
A heavily discussed period of slowed average warming over 1998–2013, the so-called “hiatus,” now appears fully consistent with the natural variance of the climate system (Cahill, Rahmstorf, and Parnell 2015), as can be readily seen in the overlay of simulated and observed temperature time series in the right panel of Figure 2. Relative to the distribution of simulations for the first decade of the 21st century, the observed values fall toward the low end of projections but never leave the envelope of expected variations. However, in addition to natural variability, it is thought that some model simulations warmed too quickly because the emissions scenarios in the RCPs underrepresented volcanic and human aerosol emissions after 2005 (Medhaug, Stolpe, Fischer, and Knutti 2017).
Based on the assessment of the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change of CMIP5 simulations, projected global mean surface temperature is likely to rise 0.9–2.3°C (1.6–4.1°F) above preindustrial levels (defined as the 1850–1900 average) by 2080–2100 under a low-emissions scenario, 1.7–3.3°C (3.1–5.9°F) under a moderate-emissions scenario (shown in Figure 2), and 3.2–5.4°C (5.8–9.7°F) under a high-emissions scenario (Collins et al. 2013).
As in the past, warming will be more rapid over land, where most economic activity occurs, compared to over the ocean. The only location on the surface that is projected by some models to cool is a very small portion of the North Atlantic Ocean just south of Greenland, where changing ocean circulation may induce cooling. Although warming will continue to occur fastest over the Arctic, average summer temperature will diverge from the historical range soonest in low-latitude regions, which experience lower historical variance. Figure 3A illustrates regional heterogeneities in the rate of warming (in °C) that are otherwise masked by globally averaged summary statistics. The map depicts the average warming at each location associated with a 1°C increase in global mean temperature; values greater than 1°C indicate rates of warming faster than the global mean, while values below 1°C indi- cate warming that is slower than the global mean.
To help grasp the potentially transformative scale of these thermal changes, Figure 4, Panel A, plots the average summertime temperatures for the lower 48 US

 Figure 3
Projected Change in Local Average Temperatures and Local Average Rainfall per 1°C of Warming in Global Mean Temperatures
A: Temperature change
B: Rainfall change
0 0.250.50.75 1 1.251.51.75 2
∆ local temperature (°C) per 1°C global temperature
–12 –9 –6 –3 0 3 6 9 12
∆ local rainfall (%)
per 1°C global temperature
Source: Collins, Knutti, et al. (2013).
Note: Changes are differences in means between 1986–2005 and 2081–2100 in CMIP5 simulations of RCP 4.5, scaled by the overall change in global mean temperature. These heatmaps should be viewed in color. See the electronic versions on the JEP website.
states, adapted from Houser et al. (2015). The cluster in the bottom left of the figure in blue text indicates historically observed temperatures, while the cluster in the upper right of the figure in red text indicates average projected mean tempera- tures for 2080–2099 across models simulating a high-emissions scenario. This layout allows for projected future temperatures to be matched to historical analogs. For example, future summers in Vermont will be similar to historical summers in Mary- land, summers in Connecticut will be similar to past summers in Arizona, future summer in New Jersey will be slightly hotter than historical Louisiana summers, and future summers in Georgia and Florida will be much hotter than anything previ- ously experienced in the United States. As shown in Panel B, a similar analysis at the level of countries shows that future temperatures in Norway are projected to be similar to historical temperatures in Germany, future Mexico will be slightly hotter than historical Iraq, future Indonesia will be similar to historical Mali, and India and Thailand are projected to be hotter than any country presently on Earth.6
Precipitation Changes
A warmer atmosphere is capable of holding more water vapor, leading to an increase in overall average precipitation (rainfall and snowfall). Observed precipita- tion in the mid-latitude Northern Hemisphere has increased since the 1950s. Heavy precipitation events in particular have increased, most clearly in North America
6 The Appendix available with this paper at http://e-jep.org shows current and projected annual average temperature for 166 countries.
Solomon Hsiang and Robert E. Kopp 17

18 Journal of Economic Perspectives
Figure 4
Average Temperatures for Lower 48 US States Observed during 1981–2010 and Projected for 2080–2099 in a High Emission (RCP 8.5) Scenario.
A: States (USA)
2080–2099 high emission (RCP 8.5) scenario
1981–2010 (Historical)
B: Countries
2080–2099 high emission (RCP 8.5) scenario
1981–2010 (Historical)
WYMIWI UT SDCA DC FL ORCORIPAWVIA KY SCOK
WA WI ME ID MT MN OR CO
PA
NV WV VA
KS MO HI
25
45
0 10 20 30 ̊C
Annual average temperature
MA
NMNJ MD
MS AZ OK
CT OH IN IL KY TN DC
VTNHNY RIUTIA CANC AR FL
WY ND SD NE DE ALSC MI
Mongolia
Norway
Canada Russia
Mexico
Bangladesh India
Russia
Germany
UK
Japan
Argentina Spain
Kenya
Saudi Arabia Indonesia
UK
S. Korea
USA Iran Mexico
Iraq Uganda
Indonesia Mali Haiti
Saudi Arabia Nigeria
India Thailand
ME WA NYMA
OH VA IL DE MO AL MS TX
VT
ID MT ND CT NH MN
NV NM HI IN MD NC TN NE
NJ
LA TX
GA AR LA KS AZ
65 75 85 ̊F
France Australia Turkey Spain
Kenya
S. Korea
Iran
China S. Africa
France Germany
China
S. Africa Japan Argentina
Uganda
GA
 20
Greenland
Greenland Mongolia
June–July–August average temperature
30  ̊C
Brazil Haiti
Iraq Thailand Mali
Norway Canada
USA Turkey Australia
65
85  ̊F
Brazil
Honduras Sudan Bangladesh
Honduras
Sudan
Nigeria
 Note: Panel A displays summertime area-average temperatures adapted from Houser et al. (2015). Panel B displays population-weighted annual average temperatures, using data from Burke, Hsiang, and Miguel (2015). Markers are vertically jittered for readability.
and Europe, where the most data is collected (Hartmann et al. 2013). Both of these changes are consistent with those expected on a warming planet. However, because the atmospheric dynamics that govern precipitation involve both large motions of air masses and processes that occur at scales below the spatial resolution of many climate models, precipitation changes are considerably more challenging to model numerically than temperature changes. This difficulty, combined with the array of changes in temperature, wind, humidity and other factors that all affect when and where precipitation falls, have rendered projections of precipitation changes more complex and more uncertain than projections of temperature.
There is large heterogeneity in the sign of projected precipitation change, with many locations getting wetter while many others get drier. Precipitation dynamics are also strongly affected by internal variability—such as the El Niño–Southern

An Economist’s Guide to Climate Change Science 19
Oscillation—and projections for specific locations depend upon changes in large-scale patterns of atmospheric circulation (Collins et al. 2013). Figure 3B illustrates average changes in local rainfall for each 1°C increase in global mean temperature. At many locations, there is a large range of uncertainty for projected changes, with plausible projections allowing for no change. Simple summary statements like “dry regions are likely become generally drier and wet regions are likely to become generally wetter” hold well over the ocean, but are coarse descriptions of the complex precipitation changes that may occur over land (Greve et al. 2014). In the United States, the most robust projections are for a springtime drying of the Southwest, summertime drying of the Northwest, and increase in winter and spring precipitation in the Northeast, upper Midwest, and northern Great Plains (Houser et al. 2015).
Humidity Changes
Specific humidity is the total moisture content of air. Relative humidity is the ratio of specific humidity to a theoretical maximum moisture capacity, which rises exponentially as temperature increases. Since the 1970s, global mean specific humidity has increased; however, there is little evidence of an increase in global mean relative humidity and some evidence for a decline, possibly reflecting faster warming of the land than of the oceans, which are the primary source of atmospheric moisture (Sherwood and Fu 2014). Models that project that the largest increases in temperature on land also tend to predict the largest decreases in relative humidity (Fischer and Knutti 2013).
One reason that humidity is thought to be economically important is that it affects human health, since higher humidity levels make it more difficult for the human body to cool itself in hot conditions through sweating. One physical metric closely related to the combined effect of heat and humidity is wet-bulb temperature. Wet- bulb temperatures are measured using a ventilated thermometer wrapped in a wet cloth, and are strongly related to the experienced conditions of a sweating person.
Dangerously hot and humid conditions are projected to become dramati- cally more likely in several regions around the world (Sherwood and Huber 2010). For example, Houser et al. (2015) defined “dangerously hot and humid days” as those characterized by peak wet-bulb temperatures over 80°F. By this definition, dangerously hot and humid days are “typical of the most humid parts of Texas and Louisiana in the hottest summer month, and the most humid summer days in Washington and Chicago.” Their analysis found that, in the southeastern United States, the population-weighted frequency of dangerously hot and humid days are projected to rise from 8 per year on average in 1981–2010 to 17–28 days per year over 2040–2059 in a moderate emissions scenario and to 40–70 days/year on average over 2080–2099 in a high emissions scenario (Houser et al. 2015).
Tropical Cyclones
Tropical cyclones are the class of phenomena that includes tropical storms, typhoons, hurricanes, and cyclones; these categories are distinguished by wind speed and the ocean basin where the storm occurs. Tropical cyclones are driven by the temperature difference between the warm ocean surface and cooler temperatures higher in the atmosphere. The warm ocean moistens overlying air, which rises and

20 Journal of Economic Perspectives
cools, releasing energy and rain. Thus, climate change is thought to have counter- vailing effects on storms: warming sea surface temperatures fuel storms, but warming temperatures higher in the atmosphere may suppress them (Knutson et al. 2010).
Tropical cyclone formation and storm trajectory depend on myriad additional factors, especially wind patterns, which introduce additional complexity into projec- tions of their future changes. Furthermore, inconsistent historical data on storms in the open ocean prior to the satellite era make inferences difficult. However, there is evidence that the frequency and intensity of the strongest storms in the Atlantic have been increasing since the 1970s, and some evidence that humans contributed to this change (Walsh et al. 2016).
Efforts to model all of these factors together broadly agree that the frequency of intense tropical cyclones (such as category 4 and 5 hurricanes), as well as the average intensity of their associated rainfall, is projected to increase with warming (Kossin et al. 2017). The effect on total number of storms remains less certain, though most studies suggest a stable or decreasing quantity of lower-intensity storms. The effect of climate change on storm tracks (the paths that storms take toward land) is uncertain and may offset or enhance the effect of increased storm intensity in some regions.
The spatial distribution of these changing risks is heterogeneous. For example, systematic changes in the spatial distribution of storm tracks within an ocean basin may reallocate cyclone risk between populations, even if the overall frequency of storms does not change. Across ocean basins, models generally agree in projecting substantial increases of storm intensity in the West Pacific, affecting East Asia and Oceania, with some decreases in activity occurring in the Indian Ocean, affecting Southern Asia and East Africa. Projecting changes in the North Atlantic, which affects Central and North America, has been more challenging; the greatest scien- tific uncertainty persists for this area (Knutson et al. 2010; Christensen et al. 2013).
Humans may also affect the genesis and growth of tropical cyclones through the regional effects of aerosol pollution. Aerosols aloft may cool local sea surface temperatures, by reflecting sunlight before it reaches the sea surface, as well as heat higher levels in the atmosphere, by absorbing sunlight when the particles are dark-colored. Both of these effects generally work to weaken storms, and storm activity in recent decades may have been greater had greenhouse gas co-pollutants been absent (Walsh et al. 2016).
Sea-Level Rise
Global mean sea-level rise is driven by two processes: an increase in the volume of the water already in the ocean, which occurs as the water warms and expands, and an increase in the mass of water in the ocean, primarily from the melting of ice on land. Since 1900, global mean sea level has increased by about 18–21 cm, with the rate of rise since about 1990 being 2–2.5 times faster than during the preceding nine decades. A substantial fraction of this rise is attributable to human-caused climate change (Sweet et al. 2017). Regional sea-level changes can differ substantively from this global trend, modulated by changes in currents and winds; changes in Earth’s gravitational field, rotation, crust, and mantle that occur as land ice changes; and changes in the height of land that result from compaction of sediments, plate

tectonics, the ongoing mantle response to historical land ice changes, and other factors (Kopp, Hay, Little, and Mitrovica 2015). Historic sea-level rise has led to a detectable increase in the frequency of coastal flooding, in some cases by more than an order of magnitude (Sweet and Park 2014).
Due to the slow response time of the oceans and ice sheets, sea-level rise is fairly insensitive to alternative emissions scenarios for the first half of this century. Across studies, median projections of future global mean sea-level rise are 20–30 cm during 2000–2050, with less than a 5 percent chance of exceeding 50 cm (for a review see Horton et al. 2018).
After 2050, projections become more deeply uncertain, due to both uncer- tain human emissions and the uncertain response of the polar ice sheets (Kopp, DeConto, et al. 2017). Median projections for 2000–2100 range from 40–80 cm for a low-emissions scenario to 70–150 cm for a high-emissions scenario. However, global mean sea-level rise of as much as 250 cm by 2100 cannot be ruled out. For reference, the last time global temperatures were about as high as they currently are (about 125,000 years ago), global mean sea-level was about 6–9 meters higher than today. Some coastal areas will be inundated permanently; others will be protected by additional investments to be incurred. The resulting increase in the frequency of tide- and wave-driven flooding is expected to render some low-lying island states uninhabitable (Storlazzi et al. 2018).
In addition to increasing average high-tide levels, a major economic conse- quence of sea-level rise results from its interaction with tropical cyclones and extratropical cyclones (like the “nor’easter” storms that sometimes hit the north- eastern United States). Storm surges that occur during these storms can impose major costs and sea-level rise adds roughly linearly to peak storm surge height. Figure 5 illus- trates the joint effects of projected sea-level rise and changing tropical cyclone activity on the flood risk of Miami, FL, and New York, NY (Hsiang et al. 2017). The extent of areas expected to flood with a 1 percent annual probability increases substantially after 2050 for Miami but much earlier in the century for many regions of New York.
Droughts and Floods
By altering temperature and precipitation patterns, climate change alters the frequency and intensity of extreme moisture conditions, such as droughts and floods. There is a limited but increasing ability to attribute intensifying extreme floods and drought to human activity. For example, Emanuel (2017) estimated that climate forcing by humans amplified the probability of rainfall experienced by Texans during Hurricane Harvey six-fold.
Since 1950, the likelihood of drought has increased in the Mediterranean and West Africa and decreased in central North America and northwestern Australia (Hartmann et al. 2013); again, assessment of the human role in this trend is chal- lenging (Bindoff et al. 2013). Some measures of drought in the United States have increased due to warming, which increases evaporation and exhibits an anthropo- genic signal (Wehner, Arnold, Knutson, Kunkel, and Legrande 2017). In model projections, the frequency of droughts tends to increase in dry regions (Collins et al. 2013), which are also projected to expand. Prolonged hot and dry periods are
Solomon Hsiang and Robert E. Kopp 21

22 Journal of Economic Perspectives
Figure 5
Areas Projected to Experience Floods at Least Once every 100 Years on Average (1% annual risk) in Miami, FL, and New York, NY
A: Miami, FL B: New York, NY
Source: Hsiang, Kopp, Jina, Rising, et al. (2017).
Note: These projections account for median projected sea-level rise and for projected changes in tropical cyclone intensity in a high-emission (RCP 8.5) scenario.
projected to become substantially more frequent in many grassland areas with low agricultural productivity, regions that today often depend on livestock production (Bell, Sum, Longmate, Tseng, and Hsiang 2018). In regions with more vegetation, amplifying oscillations between heavy rainfall and drought is projected to increase the frequency of wildfires (Abatzoglou and Williams 2016) because vegetative fuel grows rapidly during wet periods then becomes flammable during dry periods.
The observed increase in heavy precipitation suggests that climate change is contributing to increasing rain-driven flood damages ( Jiménez Cisneros, Oki, et al. 2014). Projected increases in heavy precipitation and shorter-lived snowpack are likely to further increase the frequency of inland flooding. In addition to changing rain- fall patterns, rising sea levels amplify the frequency of coastal flooding (Buchanan, Oppenheimer, and Kopp 2017). Changing patterns of flood risk are of particular economic importance, as flooding is recognized as one of the costliest classes of disaster globally (Swiss Re Institute 2018). However, in many cases, the dominant drivers of increased flood damages are related to the number of people and extent of development affected by the flood rather than the physical size of the flood.
Clouds
Understanding clouds is scientifically important, because they generate competing feedbacks in the climate system. However, cloud physics are complex, and many important dynamics occur at a spatial resolution finer than those used
   Current 2030 2050 2100

An Economist’s Guide to Climate Change Science 23
in most global climate models, generating substantial uncertainty in the projected changes in cloud cover for many regions of the world.
On the one hand, clouds reflect visible light, so increases in cloud cover, partic- ularly low-altitude cloud cover, can increase the fraction of incoming sunlight that is reflected before it warms the Earth’s surface. On the other hand, clouds absorb outgoing infrared radiation leaving the Earth’s surface and thus contribute to the green- house effect, so increases in cloud cover can amplify warming (Boucher et al. 2013).
To date, global-scale changes in cloudiness remain unclear. Looking forward, some analyses suggest the potential for circulation changes leading to large-scale, nonlinear reductions in low-latitude cloudiness with warming that could substantially increase the sensitivity of temperature to CO2 forcing (Caballero and Huber 2013).
One way in which cloud science may become important to economists is in the rapidly growing research field of “geoengineering” or “climate engineering,” which considers various proposals to intentionally alter the climate so as to coun- teract some effects of greenhouse gas emissions (Caldeira, Bala, and Cao 2013). The most widely proposed intervention is “solar radiation management,” which involves increasing the reflectivity of the atmosphere in order to shade and cool the surface. One proposed mechanism for increasing reflectivity is to spray aerosol precursors into the upper atmosphere, mimicking the mechanism through which historical volcanic eruptions have cooled the surface. Another proposal, with more localized and shorter lasting effects, is “cloud brightening,” achieved by manipu- lating cloud-droplet size by spraying particles into lower portions of the atmosphere. A theoretically appealing feature of cloud-brightening proposals is that cloud brightening might be used to temporarily cool a city or ecosystem during particu- larly damaging heat waves, although the various economic costs and unintended effects of such policies remain poorly studied (Proctor et al. 2018).
Ocean Acidification
As the CO2 concentration in the atmosphere increases, some of this CO2 will dissolve into ocean water, where it will form carbonic acid and increase ocean acidity. Currently, the ocean absorbs roughly one-quarter of global CO2 emissions through this process.
The rate of acidification depends on local chemistry, temperature, circulation patterns, and freshwater inputs. For example, in the North Pacific during the last three decades, surface ocean acidity has increased by about 12 percent. Globally, the current rate of acidification is unparalleled in at least the last 55 million years, as reflected in a variety of chemical indicators from ocean sediments (Hönisch et al. 2012). In a high-emissions scenario, global mean surface ocean acidity is projected to increase 100–150 percent ( Jewett and Romanou 2017).
Ocean acidification is thought to alter marine ecosystems substantially, although the magnitude of these effects is not well understood. The acidity of ocean waters is known to alter the ability of organisms, such as clams or corals, to create the hard shells and reefs that they depend on for survival, effects with largely unknown conse- quences for the various fish stocks and other marine products consumed around the world.

24 Journal of Economic Perspectives
Ecosystems
Numerous ecosystem changes that can be directly related to climate change have been observed. In many locations around the world, a broad suite of terrestrial organ- isms is migrating toward higher altitudes and latitudes (Chen, Hill, Ohlemüller, Roy, and Thomas 2011). In the oceans, fish are migrating to stay within their preferred water temperatures (Pinsky, Worm, Fogarty, Sarmiento, and Levin 2013). Under moderate- and high-emissions scenarios, many slow-moving terrestrial species like the coastal redwoods (Roberts and Hamann 2016) may be unable to track the northward movement of climate zones—roughly 0.1–1.3 km per year (Loarie et al. 2009)—quickly enough to stay within their thermal tolerances. In many instances, the ability of species to migrate is further aggravated by fragmentation of habitat. Overall, high-latitude ecosystems are likely to be transformed by invasions from lower latitudes, and extinctions may be common at lower latitudes (Pörtner et al. 2014).
Coral reefs—home to more than a million species—are threatened by both high temperatures and ocean acidification (Hoegh-Guldberg et al. 2007). Bleaching events associated with high temperatures have become more frequent and exten- sive, with widespread events spanning the tropics in 1998, 2010, and 2015–2016 (Hughes et al. 2017), and a majority of coral reefs around the world are projected to be at risk of degradation even under a low-emissions scenario (Frieler et al. 2013).
The relationships between climate change and ecosystem change can be difficult to untangle, because climate is only one of many human-caused factors affecting ecosystems. For example, land-use change, overexploitation, species intro- ductions, nitrogen deposition, and water resource development also play major roles and may exhibit trends that are correlated with climate change (Chapin et al. 2000). But it is worth noting that although the causes of mass extinction events in Earth’s geological history are complex and difficult to pin down, a growing body of evidence suggests that a number of the largest mass extinctions coincided with large-scale climate changes (for example, Payne and Clapham 2012).
Tipping Elements and Critical Thresholds
Nonlinearities and feedbacks in the Earth systems give rise to the potential for multiple stable states of different parts of the Earth system, with potentially rapid lock-in of a state shift once critical thresholds are crossed. These parts of the Earth system are often called “tipping elements,” and the their thresholds called “tipping points.” However, the “tipping point” language can create confusion about the speed with which state shifts can occur. In popular discourse and much of the economic analysis of climate change, changes associated with a “tipping point” are described as occurring “rapidly.” This description is accurate in a geological context, insofar as these changes are rapid relative to other comparable drivers of similar changes in the Earth system. But this description can be misleading in some economic contexts; while some state shifts may be rapid on a human timescale, others may play out over millennia. Below, we summarize a few examples; see Kopp, Shwom, Wagner, and Yuan (2016) for a detailed review.
Tipping elements can exist in the atmosphere/ocean circulation. For example, many of the climate oscillations mentioned earlier, such as El Niño–Southern

Oscillation, occur due to tipping elements, and these patterns may undergo substan- tial shifts in frequency and amplitude in a warmer climate. Large-scale patterns of ocean circulation, such as the Atlantic Meridional Overturning Circulation—an important component of global ocean circulation that plays a major role in setting temperature, precipitation, and sea level in the North Atlantic—are also potential tipping elements. These atmosphere/ocean tipping elements are among those most likely to undergo rapid shifts.
Tipping elements also occur in ice sheets. For example, positive feedbacks involving ocean-ice sheet interactions might cause sustained ice sheet loss in the Antarctic that would eventually raise global mean sea level by multiple meters or tens of meters. Indeed, some evidence suggests that multiple meters of future sea- level rise from the Antarctic may already be locked in, although depending on the pace of regional warming this rise may take many centuries to manifest.
Tipping elements can also exist in the carbon cycle and in ecosystems. For example, warming of previously frozen soils (permafrost) is allowing microbes to decompose freshly unfrozen organic material into CO2 and methane. These releases may be an important positive feedback on warming, which could potentially amplify warming by several tenths of a degree in the 21st century. Ecosystems are also well known to undergo rapid regime shifts; coral reefs, whose bleaching is discussed above, are a notable example.
How Economists Can Help Climate Science
We close with a few thoughts on how economists can provide support to climate science.
Improving Emissions Forecasts
Forecasts for greenhouse gas emissions in the coming decades and centuries are a key ingredient to physical simulations of climate change. Emissions clearly depend on global economic activity, but there is not a one-to-one mapping of economic fore- casts and the standardized RCP emissions scenarios discussed earlier. Because global emissions are a single time series, there are many possible future configurations of the global economy, technology, and policy that could produce each emissions trajectory.
The coordinated standardization exercise that produced the RCP emissions scenarios also constructed a set of five Shared Socioeconomic Pathways (SSPs), which represent standardized population projections, forecasts of economic growth and convergence, and forecasts of technological change in both the energy sector and adaptation technologies. SSPs can be loosely thought of as potential “states of the world” that might be realized in the future and which no single country can unilaterally change through policy. The narrative for SSP 1 is “Sustainability,” repre- senting a world with low barriers to both mitigation and adaptation; SSP 2 represents a “Middle of the Road” scenario; SSP 3 is “Regional Rivalry,” representing a world with high barriers to both mitigation and adaptation; SSP 4 is “Inequality,” repre- senting a world with high barriers to adaptation but low barriers to mitigation (due to slow economic growth); and SSP 5 is “Fossil-fueled development,” representing
Solomon Hsiang and Robert E. Kopp 25

26 Journal of Economic Perspectives
a world with high barriers to mitigation but low barriers to adaptation. Different combinations of SSPs and policy choices give rise to different global emission trajectories. For example, SSP 5 in the absence of policy measures can give rise to emissions consistent with RCP 8.5, but other SSPs would require carbon subsidies or similar policies to give rise to such high emissions. In all SSPs, emissions low enough to be consistent with RCPs 4.5 and 2.6 require carbon mitigation policy.
The construction of these Shared Socioeconomic Pathways and the corre- sponding sets of RCP emissions scenarios represent the output of a modeling program coordinated across numerous research groups (Moss et al. 2010). The energy/agriculture/economic/climate integrated assessment models used to construct the scenarios are elaborate process models that have been assembled by interdisciplinary teams of engineers and economic modelers, mostly from energy economics. At the heart of most models are assumptions about exogenous popula- tion growth and about the rate and convergence of technical change. Researchers using these models have addressed many issues over the years: for example, the tradeoffs among different technologies and their roles in meeting different emis- sions targets (for example, Clarke et al. 2009).
However, many economists with expertise that would be useful to these modeling exercises have remained unengaged with (or unaware of) this enter- prise. In our view, deepening engagements with economists in subfields outside of energy economics, such as macroeconomics, development economics, and polit- ical economy, will help strengthen and accelerate this research program (see also Barron 2018). Further, there should be a stronger emphasis on using empirical results and hindcasting experiments to constrain the behavior of these models (for example, Calvin, Wise, Kyle, Clarke, and Edmonds 2017).
Focusing Climate Research to Support Investigation of Economic and Social Questions
Much of climate science research is focused on answering key research ques- tions formulated by physical scientists about the nature of the global climate system. These questions are scientifically important and of substantial consequence, but in many cases, key questions or measurements about the climate system that are economically or socially important remain unanswered. We see three general areas where the potential gains from intellectual exchanges between climate scientists and economists seem large.
First, empirically disentangling the economic consequences of climate change is a large research enterprise (discussed by Auffhammer in this symposium; for a summary, see Carleton and Hsiang 2016). Such analyses universally require some “data engineering” to map physical observations appropriately onto social systems (Auffhammer, Hsiang, Schlenker, and Sobel 2013; Hsiang 2016). Several advances in this literature have arisen from methodological innovations in how physical infor- mation from climate science has been summarized and integrated into theoretical and econometric models. For example, Schlenker and Roberts (2009) developed an approach for accounting for the accumulating effects of exposure to extreme heat; Hsiang (2010) developed a method for reconstructing continuous human

An Economist’s Guide to Climate Change Science 27
exposure to tropical cyclones using standard, albeit limited, meteorological data; Hsiang, Meng, and Cane (2011) introduced a technique for identifying popula- tions heavily impacted by the El Niño–Southern Oscillation; and Proctor et al. (2018) developed an approach to isolate the optical effects of overhead volcanic aerosols. These innovations required both insight into the physics of the climate system coupled to insights from economists regarding the construction of economi- cally meaningful measures. Continued empirical progress will require deepening engagement between researchers in these two fields.
Second, global intercomparison programs for climate change models specify outputs that modeling groups must record in order to participate, but in the past these outputs have been geared towards scientific questions rather than toward calculation of economic outcomes that result from climate change. For example, the expected future correlation of drought events across the major agricultural regions is likely to be important for future food prices, but statistics about such correlated extremes are not commonly computed (Kopp, Easterling, et al. 2017). By supplying the climate modeling community with information on what variables, patterns, and scales are of key economic interest, economists can help the climate modeling community synthesize and output their findings in new and useful ways.
Finally, economists can aid climate scientists in identifying research questions that would be the most valuable to address from a socioeconomic perspective. For example, economists can help distinguish between those economic impacts for which it is most valuable to improve climate model resolution, and those for which is it more important to explore structural or parametric uncertainties, even if at lower resolu- tion. Economists can help distinguish between economic outcomes for which it is more important to constrain long-term climate sensitivity and those for which better characterization of short-term responses, natural variability, or spatial patterns is a priority. Economists can also identify new climate observations that would contribute the greatest value to improved risk-management strategies. In short, economists are well suited to support climate scientists by valuing the different types of information that these scientists could potentially provide to the world.
Climate change management is an urgent and pervasive societal challenge. Natural scientists have had a century’s head start over economists in studying the topic, but at this point, input from social scientists can be especially productive. We hope this article can spur more economists to engage in this challenge.
■ We thank Tamma Carleton, Megan Lickley, Daniel Gilford, and DJ Rasmussen for helpful comments.

28 Journal of Economic Perspectives
References
Abatzoglou, John T., and A. Park Williams.
2016. “Impact of Anthropogenic Climate Change on Wildfire across Western US Forests.” PNAS 113 (42): 11770–75.
Allen, Myles R., David J. Frame, Chris Hunt- ingford, Chris D. Jones, Jason A. Lowe, Malte Meinshausen, and Nicolai Meinshausen. 2009. “Warming Caused by Cumulative Carbon Emissions towards the Trillionth Tonne.” Nature 458(7242): 1163–66.
Archer, David, Michael Eby, Victor Brovkin, Andy Ridgwell, Long Cao, Uwe Mikolajewicz, Ken Caldeira, Katsumi Matsumoto, Guy Munhoven, AlvaroMontenegro,andKathyTokos.2009.“Atmo- spheric Lifetime of Fossil Fuel Carbon Dioxide.” Annual Review of Earth and Planetary Sciences 37(1): 117–34.
Auffhammer, Maximilian, Solomon M. Hsiang, Wolfram Schlenker, and Adam Sobel. 2013. “Using Weather Data and Climate Model Output in Economic Analyses of Climate Change.” Review of Environmental Economics and Policy 7(2): 181–98.
Barron, Alexander R. 2018. “Time to Refine Key Climate Policy Models.” Nature Climate Change 8(5): 350–52.
Beckley, B., N.P. Zelensky, S.A. Holmes, F.G. Lemoine, R.D. Ray, G.T. Mitchum, S. Desai, S.T. Brown. 2016. Global Mean Sea Level Trend from Integrated Multi-Mission Ocean Altimeters TOPEX/Poseidon Jason-1 and OSTM/Jason-2 Version 4.2. Ver. 4.2. PO.DAAC, CA, USA, http:// dx.doi.org/10.5067/GMSLM-TJ142.
Bell, K., S. Sum, J. Longmate, J. Tseng, and S. Hsiang. 2018. “Empirically Valuing Factors of Natural Capital in Pasture Systems.” Working paper.
Berger, André. 2012. “A Brief History of the Astronomical Theories of Paleoclimates.” In Climate Change: Inferences from Paleoclimate and Regional Aspects, edited by André Berger, Fedor Mesinger, and Djordje Sijacki. 107–129. Springer.
Bindoff, N. L., P. A. Stott, K. M. AchutaRao, M. R. Allen, N. Gillett, D. Gutzler, K. Hansingo, G. Hegerl, Y. Hu, S. Jain, I. I. Mokhov, J. Overland, J. Perlwitz, R. Sebbari and X. Zhang. 2013. “Detec- tion and Attribution of Climate Change: From Global to Regional.” Chap. 10 in Climate Change 2013: The Physical Science Basis, Working Group 1 Contribution to the Fifth Assessment Report of the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change, edited by Thomas F. Stocker et al. Cambridge, UK: Cambridge University Press.
Blanco G., R. Gerlagh, S. Suh, J. Barrett, H. C. de Coninck, C. F. Diaz Morejon, R. Mathur, N. Nakicenovic, A. Ofosu Ahenkora, J. Pan, H. Pathak, J. Rice, R. Richels, S. J. Smith, D. I. Stern, F. L. Toth, and P. Zhou. 2014. “Drivers, Trends and Mitigation.”
Chap. 5 in Climate Change 2014: Mitigation of Climate Change, Contribution of Working Group III to the Fifth Assessment Report of the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change, edited by O. Edenhofer et al. Cambridge University Press..
Boden, T., G. Marland, and R. J. Andres. 2017. “Global, Regional, and National Fossil-Fuel CO2 Emissions (1751–2014) (V. 2017).” Oak Ridge, TN: Carbon Dioxide Information Analysis Center (CDIAC), Oak Ridge National Laboratory (ORNL). http://dx.doi.org/10.3334/CDIAC/00001_V2017.
Boucher, O., D. Randall, P. Artaxo, C. Breth- erton, G. Feingold, P. Forster, V.-M. Kerminen, Y.Kondo,H.Liao,U.Lohmann,P.Rasch,S.K. Satheesh, S. Sherwood, B. Stevens, and X.Y. Zhang. 2013. “Clouds and Aerosols.” Chap. 7 in Climate Change 2013: The Physical Science Basis. Contribu- tion of Working Group I to the Fifth Assessment Report of the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change, edited by T. F. Stocker et al. Cambridge University Press.
Buchanan, Maya K., Michael Oppenheimer, and Robert E. Kopp. 2017. “Amplification of Flood Frequencies with Local Sea Level Rise and Emerging Flood Regimes.” Environmental Research Letters 12(6): 064009.
Burke, Marshall, Solomon M. Hsiang, and Edward Miguel. 2015. “Global Non-Linear Effect of Temperature on Economic Production.” Nature 527 (7577): 235–39.
Caballero, Rodrigo, and Matthew Huber. 2013. “State-Dependent Climate Sensitivity in Past Warm Climates and Its Implications for Future Climate Projections.” PNAS 110(35): 14162–67.
Cahill, Niamh, Stefan Rahmstorf, and Andrew C. Parnell. 2015. “Change Points of Global Temper- ature.” Environmental Research Letters 10(8): 084002.
Caldeira, Ken, Govindasamy Bala, and Long Cao. 2013. “The Science of Geoengineering.” Annual Review of Earth and Planetary Sciences 41(1): 231–56.
Calvin, Katherine, Marshall Wise, Page Kyle, Leon Clarke, and Jae Edmonds. 2017. “A Hindcast Experiment Using the Gcam 3.0 Agriculture and Land-Use Module.” Climate Change Economics 08(01): 1750005.
Carleton, Tamma A., and Solomon M. Hsiang.
2016. “Social and Economic Impacts of Climate.” Science 353(6304): aad9837.
Chapin, F. Stuart, Erika S. Zavaleta, Valerie T. Eviner, Rosamond L. Naylor, Peter M. Vitousek, Heather L. Reynolds, David U. Hooper, Sandra Lavorel, Osvaldo E. Sala, Sarah E. Hobbie, Michelle C. Mack, and Sandra Díaz. 2000. “Consequences of Changing Biodiversity.” Nature, 405: 234–242.
Chen, I.-Ching, Jane K. Hill, Ralf Ohlemüller,
             
David B. Roy, and Chris D. Thomas. 2011. “Rapid Range Shifts of Species Associated with High Levels of Climate Warming.” Science 333 (6045): 1024–26.
Christensen, J. H., K. Kanikicharla, E. Aldrian, S.-I. An, I. F. A. Cavalcanti, M. de Castro, W. Dong, P. Goswami, A. Hall, J. K. Kanyanga, A. Kitoh, J. Kossin, N.-C. Lau, J. Renwick, D. B. Stephenson, S.-P. Xie and T. Zhou. 2013. “Climate Phenomena and Their Relevance for Future Regional Climate Change.” Chap. 14 in Climate Change 2013: The Physical Science Basis, edited by Thomas F. Stocker, et al. Cambridge, UK: Cambridge University Press. Available at: http://www.ipcc.ch/report/ar5/ wg1/.
Clarke, Leon, Jae Edmonds, Volker Krey, Richard Richels, Steven Rose, and Massimo Tavoni. 2009. “International Climate Policy Architectures: Overview of the EMF 22 International Scenarios.” Energy Economics 31(S2): S64–S81.
Clement, Amy, Katinka Bellomo, Lisa N. Murphy, Mark A. Cane, Thorsten Mauritsen, Gaby Rädel, and Bjorn Stevens. 2015. “The Atlantic Multidecadal Oscillation without a Role for Ocean Circulation.” Science 350 (6258): 320–24.
Collins, M., R. Knutti, J. Arblaster, J.-L. Dufresne, T. Fichefet, P. Friedlingstein, X. Gao, W.J. Gutowski, T. Johns, G. Krinner, M. Shongwe, C. Tebaldi, A.J. Weaver, and M. Wehner. 2013. “Long-Term Climate Change: Projections, Commitments and Irreversibility.” Chap. 12 in Climate Change 2013: The Physical Science Basis, edited by Thomas F. Stocker, et al. Cambridge University Press. Available at: http://www.ipcc.ch/report/ar5/wg1/.
Cook, John, Naomi Oreskes, Peter T. Doran, William R. L. Anderegg, Bart Verheggen, Ed W. Maibach, J. Stuart Carlton, Stephan Lewandowsky, Andrew G., Skuce, Sarah A. Green, Dana Nuccitelli, Peter Jacobs, Mark Richardson, Bärbel Winkler, Rob Painting, and Ken Rice. 2016. “Consensus on Consensus: A Synthesis of Consensus Estimates on Human-Caused Global Warming.” Environmental Research Letters 11(4): 048002.
Cramer, B. S., K. G. Miller, P. J Barrett, and J. D. Wright. 2011. “Late Cretaceous–Neogene Trends in Deep Ocean Temperature and Continental Ice Volume: Reconciling Records of Benthic Forami- niferal Geochemistry (Δ18O and Mg/Ca) with Sea Level History.” Journal of Geophysical Research: Oceans 116 (C12): C12023.
Edwards, R. J., and B. P. Horton. 2000. “Recon- structing Relative Sea-Level Change Using UK Salt-Marsh Foraminifera.” Marine Geology 169(1–2): 41–56.
Emanuel, Kerry. 2017. “Assessing the Present and Future Probability of Hurricane Harvey’s Rainfall.” PNAS, 114 (48): 12681–12684. https:// doi.org/10.1073/pnas.1716222114.
Fischer, E. M., and R. Knutti. 2013. “Robust Projections of Combined Humidity and
Temperature Extremes.” Nature Climate Change 3(2): 126–30.
Frieler, K., M. Meinshausen, A. Golly, M. Mengel, K. Lebek, S. D. Donner, and O. Hoegh-Guldberg. 2013. “Limiting Global Warming to 2 °C Is Unlikely to Save Most Coral Reefs.” Nature Climate Change 3(2): 165–70.
GISTEMP Team. 2018. GISS Surface Tempera- ture Analysis (GISTEMP). Dataset. NASA Goddard Institute for Space Studies. https://data.giss.nasa. gov/gistemp/.
Greve, Peter, Boris Orlowsky, Brigitte Mueller, Justin Sheffield, Markus Reichstein, and Sonia I. Seneviratne. 2014. “Global Assessment of Trends in Wetting and Drying over Land.” Nature Geoscience 7(10): 716–21.
Hansen, J., D. Johnson, A. Lacis, S. Lebedeff, P. Lee, D. Rind, and G. Russell. 1981. “Climate Impact of Increasing Atmospheric Carbon Dioxide.” Science 213(4511): 957–66.
Hartmann, D. L., A. M. G. Klein Tank, M. Rusti- cucci, L. V. Alexander, S. Brönnimann, Y. Charabi, F.J. Dentener, E. J. Dlugokencky, D. R. Easterling, A. Kaplan, B. J. Soden, P. W. Thorne, M. Wild, and P.M. Zhai. 2013. “Observations: Atmosphere and Surface.” Chap. 2 in Climate Change 2013: The Physical Science Basis, edited by Thomas F. Stocker, et al. Cambridge University Press. Available at: http://www.ipcc.ch/report/ar5/wg1/.
Hawkins, Ed, and Rowan Sutton. 2009. “The Potential to Narrow Uncertainty in Regional Climate Predictions.” Bulletin of the American Meteo- rological Society 90(8): 1095–1107.
Hay, Carling C., Eric Morrow, Robert E. Kopp, and Jerry X. Mitrovica. 2015. “Probabilistic Reanalysis of Twentieth-Century Sea-Level Rise.” Nature 517(7535): 481–84.
Hayhoe, K., J. Edmonds, R. E. Kopp, A. N. LeGrande, B. M. Sanderson, M. F. Wehner, and D. J. Wuebbles. 2017. “Climate Models, Scenarios, and Projections.” Chap. 4 in Climate Science Special Report: Fourth National Climate Assessment, Vol. I, edited by D. J. Wuebbles, D. W. Fahey, K. A. Hibbard, D. J. Dokken, B. C. Stewart, and T. K. Maycock, 411–29. Washington, DC, USA: U.S. Global Change Research Program.
Hegerl, G. C., F. W. Zwiers, P. Braconnot, N. P. Gillett, Y. Luo, J. A. Marengo Orsini, N. Nicholls, J. E. Penner, and P. A. Stott. 2007. “Understanding and Attributing Climate Change.” Chap. 9 in Climate Change 2007: The Physical Science Basis. Contribution of Working Group I to the Fourth Assess- ment Report of the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change, edited by S. Solomon, D. Qin, M. Manning, Z. Chen, M. Marquis, K. B. Averyt, M. Tignor, and H. L. Miller. Cambridge University Press.
Hoegh-Guldberg, O., et al. 2007. “Coral Reefs Under Rapid Climate Change and Ocean Acidifica- tion.” Science 318(5857): 1737–42.
Solomon Hsiang and Robert E. Kopp 29
           
30 Journal of Economic Perspectives
 Hönisch, Bärbel, et al. 2012. “The Geological Record of Ocean Acidification.” Science 335(6072): 1058–63.
Horton, Benjamin P., Robert E. Kopp, Andra J. Garner, Carling C. Hay, Nicole S. Khan, Keven Roy, and Timothy A. Shaw. 2018. “Mapping Sea-Level Change in Time, Space and Probability.” Annual Review of Environment and Resources. https://doi. org/10.1146/annurev-environ-102017-025826.
Houser, Trevor, Solomon Hsiang, Robert Kopp, Kate Larsen, Michael Delgado, Amir Jina, Michael Mastrandrea, Shashank Mohan, Robert Muir-Wood, D. J. Rasmussen, James Rising, and Paul Wilson. 2015. Economic Risks of Climate Change: An American Prospectus. New York: Columbia University Press.
Hsiang, Solomon M. 2010. “Temperatures and Cyclones Strongly Associated with Economic Production in the Caribbean and Central America.” PNAS 107(35): 15367–72.
Hsiang, Solomon. 2016. “Climate Economet- rics.” Annual Review of Resource Economics 8(1): 43–75.
Hsiang, Solomon, Robert Kopp, Amir Jina, James Rising, Michael Delgado, Shashank Mohan, D. J. Rasmussen, Robert Muir-Wood, Paul Wilson, Michael Oppenheimer, Kate Larsen, and Trevor Houser. 2017. “Estimating Economic Damage from Climate Change in the United States.” Science 356(6345): 1362–1369.
Hsiang, Solomon M., and Kyle C. Meng. 2015. “Tropical Economics.” American Economic Review 105(5): 257–61.
Hsiang, Solomon M., Kyle C. Meng, and Mark A. Cane. 2011. “Civil Conflicts Are Associated with the Global Climate.” Nature 476(7361): 438–41.
Hughes, Terry P. et al. 2017. “Global Warming and Recurrent Mass Bleaching of Corals.” Nature 543(7645): 373–77.
Hurrell, James W. 1995. “Decadal Trends in the North Atlantic Oscillation: Regional Temperatures and Precipitation.” Science 269(5224): 676–79.
Janssens-Maenhout, G., M. Crippa, D. Guiz- zardi, M. Muntean, E. Schaaf, J. G. J. Olivier, J. A. H. W. Peters, and K. M. Schure. 2017. Fossil CO2 & GHG Emissions of All World Countries. JRC Science for Policy Report, EUR 28766 EN. Luxembourg: Publications Office of the European Union.
Jewett, L., and A. Romanou. 2017. “Ocean Acidi- fication and Other Ocean Changes.” Chap. 13 in Climate Science Special Report: Fourth National Climate Assessment, Vol. I, edited by D. J. Wuebbles, D. W. Fahey, K. A. Hibbard, D. J. Dokken, B. C. Stewart, and T. K. Maycock, 411–29. Washington, DC, USA: U.S. Global Change Research Program.
Jimenez Cisneros, Blanca E., Taikan Oki, Nigel W. Arnell, Gerardo Benito, J. Graham Cogley, Petra Döll, Tong Jiang, and Shadrack S. Mwakalila. 2014. “Freshwater Resources.” In Climate Change 2014: Impacts, Adaptation and Vulnerability, edited by C. B.
Field et al., 229–269. Cambridge University Press.
Jones, Gareth S., Peter A. Stott, and Nikolaos Christidis. 2013. “Attribution of Observed Historical Near-Surface Temperature Variations to Anthropogenic and Natural Causes Using CMIP5 Simulations.” Journal of Geophysical Research: Atmo- spheres 118(10): 4001–24.
Jones, P. D., et al. 2009. “High-Resolution Palaeoclimatology of the Last Millennium: A Review of Current Status and Future Prospects.” The Holocene 19(1): 3–49.
Joos, F., et al. 2013. “Carbon Dioxide and Climate Impulse Response Functions for the Computation of Greenhouse Gas Metrics: A Multi-Model Analysis.” Atmospheric Chemistry and Physics 13(5): 2793–2825.
Keeling, Charles D., Stephen C. Piper, Robert B. Bacastow, Martin Wahlen, Timothy P. Whorf, Martin Heimann, and Harro A. Meijer. 2001. “Exchanges of Atmospheric CO2 and 13CO2 with the Terrestrial Biosphere and Oceans from 1978 to 2000. I. Global Aspects,” June. SIO Reference no 01-06. https:// escholarship.org/uc/item/09v319r9.
Knutson, Thomas R., John L. McBride, Johnny Chan, Kerry Emanuel, Greg Holland, Chris Landsea, Isaac Held, James P. Kossin, A. K. Sriv- astava, and Masato Sugi. 2010. “Tropical Cyclones and Climate Change.” Nature Geoscience 3(3): 157.
Kopp, Robert E., Robert M. DeConto, Daniel A. Bader, Radley M. Horton, Carling C. Hay, Scott Kulp, Michael Oppenheimer, David Pollard, and Benjamin H. Strauss. 2017. “Evolving Understanding of Antarctic Ice-Sheet Physics and Ambiguity in Probabilistic Sea-Level Projections.” Earth’s Future 5(12): 1217–33.
Kopp, Robert E., D. R. Easterling, T. Hall, K. Hayhoe, R. Horton, K. E. Kunkel, and A. N. LeGrande. 2017. “Potential Surprises—Compound Extremes and Tipping Elements.” Chap 15 in Climate Science Special Report: Fourth National Climate Assessment, Volume I, edited by D. J. Wuebbles, D. W. Fahey, K. A. Hibbard, D. J. Dokken, B. C. Stewart, and T. K. Maycock. Washington, DC, USA: U.S. Global Change Research Program.
Kopp, Robert E., Carling C. Hay, Christopher M. Little, and Jerry X. Mitrovica. 2015. “Geographic Variability of Sea-Level Change.” Current Climate Change Reports 1(3): 192–204.
Kopp, Robert E., Andrew C. Kemp, Klaus Bitter- mann, Benjamin P. Horton, Jeffrey P. Donnelly, W. Roland Gehrels, Carling C. Hay, Jerry X. Mitrovica, Eric D. Morrow, and Stefan Rahmstorf. 2016. “Temperature-Driven Global Sea-Level Variability in the Common Era.” PNAS 113(11): E1434–41.
Kopp, Robert E., Rachael Shwom, Gernot Wagner, and Jiacan Yuan. 2016. “Tipping Elements and Climate-Economic Shocks: Pathways toward Integrated Assessment.” Earth’s Future 4(8): 346–72.
Kossin, J. P., T. Hall, T. Knutson, K. E. Kunkel,
               
R. J. Trapp, D. E. Waliser, and M. F. Wehner. 2017. “Extreme Storms.” Chap. 9 in Climate Science Special Report: Fourth National Climate Assessment, Volume I, edited by D. J. Wuebbles, D. W. Fahey, K. A. Hibbard, D. J. Dokken, B. C. Stewart, and T. K. Maycock. Washington, DC, USA: U.S. Global Change Research Program.
Lambeck, Kurt, Hélène Rouby, Anthony Purcell, Yiying Sun, and Malcolm Sambridge. 2014. “Sea Level and Global Ice Volumes from the Last Glacial Maximum to the Holocene.” PNAS: 111(43): 15296–303.
Le Quéré, Corinne, et al. 2018. “Global Carbon Budget 2017.” Earth System Science Data 10(1): 405–48.
Loarie, Scott R., Philip B. Duffy, Healy Hamilton, Gregory P. Asner, Christopher B. Field, and David D. Ackerly. 2009. “The Velocity of Climate Change.” Nature 462(7276): 1052–55.
Lorenz, Edward N. 1963. “Deterministic Nonpe- riodic Flow.” Journal of the Atmospheric Sciences 20(2): 130–41.
Lüthi, Dieter, Martine Le Floch, Bernhard Bereiter, Thomas Blunier, Jean-Marc Barnola, Urs Siegenthaler, Dominique Raynaud, Jean Jouzel, Hubertus Fischer, Kenji Kawamura, and Thomas F. Stocker. 2008. “High-Resolution Carbon Dioxide Concentration Record 650,000–800,000 Years before Present.” Nature 453(7193): 379–82.
MacFarling Meure, C., D. Etheridge, C. Trudinger, P. Steele, R. Langenfelds, T. Van Ommen, A. Smith, and J. Elkins. 2006. “Law Dome CO2, CH4 and N2O Ice Core Records Extended to 2000 Years BP.” Geophysical Research Letters 33(14): L14810.
Maher, Nicola, Alexander Sen Gupta, and Matthew H. England. 2014. “Drivers of Decadal Hiatus Periods in the 20th and 21st Centuries.” Geophysical Research Letters 41(16): 5978–86.
Manabe, Syukuro, and Joseph Smagorinsky.
1965. “Simulated Climatology of a General Circula- tion Model with a Hydrological Cycle.” Monthly Weather Review 95(4): 769–98.
Manabe, Syukuro, and Robert F. Strickler. 1964. “Thermal Equilibrium of the Atmosphere with a Convective Adjustment.” Journal of the Atmospheric Sciences 21(4): 361–85.
Mantua, Nathan J., and Steven R. Hare. 2002. “The Pacific Decadal Oscillation.” Journal of Ocean- ography 58(1): 35–44.
Marcott, Shaun A., Jeremy D. Shakun, Peter U. Clark, and Alan C. Mix. 2013. “A Reconstruction of Regional and Global Temperature for the Past 11,300 Years.” Science 339(6124): 1198–1201.
Marsicek, Jeremiah, Bryan N. Shuman, Patrick J. Bartlein, Sarah L. Shafer, and Simon Brewer. 2018. “Reconciling Divergent Trends and Millen- nial Variations in Holocene Temperatures.” Nature 554(7690): 92–96.
Medhaug, Iselin, Martin B. Stolpe, Erich M. Fischer, and Reto Knutti. 2017. “Reconciling Controversies about the ‘Global Warming Hiatus.’” Nature 545(7652): 41–47.
Meehl, Gerald A., et al. 2009. “Decadal Predic- tion: Can It Be Skillful?” Bulletin of the American Meteorological Society 90(10): 1467–86.
Morice, Colin P., John J. Kennedy, Nick A. Rayner, and Phil D. Jones. 2012. “Quantifying Uncertainties in Global and Regional Temperature Change Using an Ensemble of Observational Estimates: The HadCRUT4 Data Set.” Journal of Geophysical Research: Atmospheres 117(D8): D08101.
Moss, Richard H., et al. 2010. “The next Genera- tion of Scenarios for Climate Change Research and Assessment.” Nature 463(7282): 747–56.
Nordhaus, William D. 1977. “Economic Growth and Climate: The Carbon Dioxide Problem.” American Economic Review 67(1): 341–46.
Payne, Jonathan L., and Matthew E. Clapham.
2012. “End-Permian Mass Extinction in the Oceans: An Ancient Analog for the Twenty-First Century?” Annual Review of Earth and Planetary Sciences 40(1): 89–111.
Pinsky, Malin L., Boris Worm, Michael J. Fogarty, Jorge L. Sarmiento, and Simon A. Levin. 2013. “Marine Taxa Track Local Climate Velocities.” Science 341(6151): 1239–42.
Pongratz, Julia, and Ken Caldeira. 2012. “Attri- bution of Atmospheric CO2 and Temperature Increases to Regions: Importance of Preindustrial Land Use Change.” Environmental Research Letters 7(3): 034001.
Pörtner, Hans-Otto, David M. Karl, Philip W. Boyd, William Cheung, Salvador E. Lluch-Cota, Yukihiro Nojiri, Daniela N. Schmidt, Peter O. Zavialov, Jürgen Alheit, and Javier Aristegui. 2014. “Ocean Systems.” Chap. 6 in Climate Change 2014: Impacts, Adaptation, and Vulnerability. Part A: Global and Sectoral Aspects. Contribution of Working Group II to the Fifth Assessment Report of the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change. Cambridge University Press.
Proctor, Jonathan, Solomon Hsiang, Jennifer Burney, Marshall Burke, and Wolfram Schlenker. 2018. “Estimating Global Agricultural Effects of Geoengineering Using Volcanic Eruptions.” Nature 560(7719): 480–83.
Roberts, David R., and Andreas Hamann. 2016. “Climate Refugia and Migration Requirements in Complex Landscapes.” Ecography 39(12): 1238–46.
Rohde, Robert, Richard A. Muller, Robert Jacobsen, Elizabeth Muller, Saul Perlmutter, Arthur Rosenfeld, Jonathan Wurtele, Donald Groom, and Charlotte Wickham. 2013. “A New Estimate of the Average Earth Surface Land Temperature Span- ning 1753 to 2011.” Geoinformatics & Geostatistics: An Overview 1(1).
Rosenfeld, Daniel, Ulrike Lohmann, Graciela B.
An Economist’s Guide to Climate Change Science 31
                   
32 Journal of Economic Perspectives
 Raga, Colin D. O’Dowd, Markku Kulmala, Sandro Fuzzi, Anni Reissell, and Meinrat O. Andreae. 2008. “Flood or Drought: How Do Aerosols Affect Precipitation?” Science 321(5894): 1309–13.
Schlenker, Wolfram, and Michael J. Roberts.
2009. “Nonlinear Temperature Effects Indicate Severe Damages to U.S. Crop Yields Under Climate Change.” PNAS 106(37): 15594–15598.
Serreze, Mark C., and Roger G. Barry. 2011. “Processes and Impacts of Arctic Amplification: A Research Synthesis.” Global and Planetary Change 77(1): 85–96.
Sherwood, Steven C., and Matthew Huber. 2010. “An Adaptability Limit to Climate Change Due to Heat Stress.” PNAS 107(21): 9552–55.
Sherwood, Steven, and Qiang Fu. 2014. “A Drier Future?” Science 343(6172): 737–39.
Stocker, T. F., D. Qin, G.-K. Plattner, M. Tignor, S.K. Allen, J. Boschung, A. Nauels, Y. Xia, V. Bex, and P.M. Midgley (eds). 2013. Climate Change 2013: The Physical Science Basis. Contribution of Working Group 1 to the Fifth Assessment Report of the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change. Cambridge University Press.
Storlazzi, Curt D., Stephen B. Gingerich, Ap van Dongeren, Olivia M. Cheriton, Peter W. Swar- zenski, Ellen Quataert, Clifford I. Voss, Donald W. Field, Hariharasubramanian Annamalai, Greg A. Piniak, and Robert McCall. 2018. “Most Atolls Will Be Uninhabitable by the Mid-21st Century Because of Sea-Level Rise Exacerbating Wave-Driven Flooding.” Science Advances 4(4): eaap9741.
Trouet, Valerie, Grant L. Harley, and Marta Domínguez-Delmás. 2016. “Shipwreck Rates Reveal Caribbean Tropical Cyclone Response to Past Radiative Forcing.” PNAS 113(12): 3169–74.
Trouet, V., J. D. Scourse, and C. C. Raible. 2012. “North Atlantic Storminess and Atlantic Meridional Overturning Circulation during the Last Millen- nium: Reconciling Contradictory Proxy Records of NAO Variability.” Global and Planetary Change 84–85: 48–55.
U.S. Global Change Research Program (USGCRP). 2017. Climate Science Special Report: Fourth National Climate Assessment, Vol I. Edited by Donald J. Wuebbles, D. W. Fahey, K. A. Hibbard, D. J. Dokken, B. C. Stewart, and T. K. Maycock. Washington, DC: U.S. Global Change Research Program.
Walsh, Kevin J. E., John L. McBride, Philip J. Klotzbach, Sethurathinam Balachandran, Suzana J. Camargo, Greg Holland, Thomas R. Knutson, James P. Kossin, Tsz-cheung Lee, Adam Sobel, and Masato Sugi. 2016. “Tropical Cyclones and Climate Change.” Wiley Interdisciplinary Reviews: Climate Change 7(1): 65–89.
Weart, Spencer R. 2018. The Discovery of Global Warming. A hypertext history. February. https:// history.aip.org/climate/index.htm.
Wehner, M. F., J. R. Arnold, T. Knutson, K. E. Kunkel, and A. N. Legrande. 2017. “Droughts, Floods, and Wildfires.” Chap. 8 in Climate Science Special Report: Fourth National Climate Assessment, Vol. I, edited by D. J. Wuebbles, D. W. Fahey, K. A. Hibbard, D. J. Dokken, B. C. Stewart, and T. K. Maycock. Washington, DC: U.S. Global Change Research Program.
       Supran, Geoffrey, and Naomi Oreskes. 2017.
“Assessing ExxonMobil’s Climate Change Commu-
nications (1977–2014).” Environmental Research
Letters12(8):084019. Westervelt,D.M.,L.W.Horowitz,V.Naik,
 Sweet, William V., R. Horton, R. E. Kopp, A. N. LeGrande, and A. Romanou. 2017. “Sea Level Rise.” Chap. 12 in Climate Science Special Report: Fourth National Climate Assessment, Vol. I, edited by D. J. Wuebbles, D. W. Fahey, K. A. Hibbard, D. J. Dokken, B. C. Stewart, and T. K. Maycock, 333–63. Washington, DC, USA: U.S. Global Change Research Program.
Sweet, William V., and Joseph Park. 2014. “From the Extreme to the Mean: Acceleration and Tipping Points of Coastal Inundation from Sea Level Rise.” Earth’s Future 2(12): 579–600.
Swiss Re Institute. 2018. “Sigma 2/2017: Natural Catastrophes and Man-Made Disasters in 2016: A Year of Widespread Damages.” http://institute. swissre.com/research/overview/sigma/2_2017. html.
Taylor, Karl E., Ronald J. Stouffer, and Gerald A. Meehl. 2012. “An Overview of CMIP5 and the Experiment Design.” Bulletin of the American Meteo- rological Society 93(4): 485–98.
J.-C. Golaz, and D. L. Mauzerall. 2015. “Radiative Forcing and Climate Response to Projected 21st Century Aerosol Decreases.” Atmospheric Chemistry and Physics 15(22): 12681–703.
Wigley, T. M. L. 2011. “Coal to Gas: The Influ- ence of Methane Leakage.” Climatic Change 108(3): 601–608.
Wood, A. W., L. R. Leung, V. Sridhar, and D. P. Lettenmaier. 2004. “Hydrologic Implications of Dynamical and Statistical Approaches to Down- scaling Climate Model Outputs.” Climatic Change 62 (1–3): 189–216.
Wuebbles, D. J., D. R. Easterling, K. Hayhoe, T. Knutson, R. E. Kopp, J. P. Kossin, K. E. Kunkel, et al. 2017. “Our Globally Changing Climate.” Chap. 1 in Climate Science Special Report: Fourth National Climate Assessment, Vol. I, edited by D. J. Wuebbles, D. W. Fahey, K. A. Hibbard, D. J. Dokken, B. C. Stewart, and T. K. Maycock. Wash- ington, DC, USA: U.S. Global Change Research Program.
    
This article has been cited by:
1.Mercy Berman DeMenno. 2023. Environmental sustainability and financial stability: can macroprudential stress testing measure and mitigate climate-related systemic financial risk?. Journal of Banking Regulation 24:4, 445-473. [Crossref]
2. Kai Tang, Kun Zhang. 2023. The Effects of Low-Carbon Governance on Energy-Environmental Efficiency: Evidence from China’s Low-Carbon City Pilot Policy. Emerging Markets Finance and Trade 1-19. [Crossref]
3.Kai Zhu, Yufeng Cheng, Quan Zhou, Zsombor Kápolnai, Lóránt Dénes Dávid. 2023. The contributions of climate and land use/cover changes to water yield services considering geographic scale. Heliyon 9:10, e20115. [Crossref]
4. Remi Jedwab, Federico Haslop, Roman D. Zarate, Carlos Rodriguez-Castelán. The Effects of Climate Change in the Poorest Countries: Evidence from the Permanent Shrinking of Lake Chad 149, . [Crossref]
5. Guillaume Flament. 2023. Impact of the energy transition on long-term factor productivity. Structural Change and Economic Dynamics 66, 393-406. [Crossref]
6. Julia Mazzei, Tommaso Rughi, Maria Enrica Virgillito. 2023. Knowing brown and inventing green? Incremental and radical innovative activities in the automotive sector. Industry and Innovation 30:7, 824-863. [Crossref]
7. Claire Alestra, Gilbert Cette, Valérie Chouard, Rémy Lecat. 2023. How can technology significantly contribute to climate change mitigation?. Applied Economics 30, 1-13. [Crossref]
8. Oscar Zapata. 2023. Weather Disasters, Material Losses and Income Inequality: Evidence from a Tropical, Middle-Income Country. Economics of Disasters and Climate Change 91. . [Crossref]
9. Zuoxiang Zhao, Giray Gozgor, Marco Chi Keung Lau, Mantu Kumar Mahalik, Gupteswar Patel, Rabeh Khalfaoui. 2023. The impact of geopolitical risks on renewable energy demand in OECD countries. Energy Economics 122, 106700. [Crossref]
10. Grace Weishi Gu, Galina Hale. 2023. Climate risks and FDI. Journal of International Economics 3674777, 103731. [Crossref]
11. Vinod Thomas. Intractability of Climate Change 95-123. [Crossref]
12. René Aïd, Sara Biagini. 2023. Optimal dynamic regulation of carbon emissions market. Mathematical
Finance 33:1, 80-115. [Crossref]
13. Boureima Sawadogo. 2022. Drought Impacts on the Crop Sector and Adaptation Options in Burkina Faso: A Gender-Focused Computable General Equilibrium Analysis. Sustainability 14:23, 15637. [Crossref]
14. Erhong Wang, Giray Gozgor, Mantu Kumar Mahalik, Gupteswar Patel, Guoheng Hu. 2022. Effects of institutional quality and political risk on the renewable energy consumption in the OECD countries. Resources Policy 79, 103041. [Crossref]
15.Sinyoung O. Lee, Nelson C. Mark, Jonas Nauerz, Jonathan Rawls, Zhiyi Wei. 2022. Global temperature shocks and real exchange rates. Journal of Climate Finance 1, 100004. [Crossref]
16.Peter von zur Muehlen. 2022. Prices and Taxes in a Ramsey Climate Policy Model under Heterogeneous Beliefs and Ambiguity. Economies 10:10, 257. [Crossref]
17. Yinghao Pan, Yu Qin, Fan Zhang, Hongjia Zhu. 2022. Acquiring land in cold winter: Consequences and possible explanations. Journal of Environmental Economics and Management 116, 102721. [Crossref]
18. Farzana Afridi, Kanika Mahajan, Nikita Sangwan. 2022. The gendered effects of droughts: Production shocks and labor response in agriculture. Labour Economics 78, 102227. [Crossref]

19. Xuefeng Zhu, Cheng Lei, Jing Qi, Guangyin Zhen, Xueqin Lu, Suyun Xu, Jie Zhang, Hongbo Liu, Xuedong Zhang, Zhichao Wu. 2022. The role of microbiome in carbon sequestration and environment security during wastewater treatment. Science of The Total Environment 837, 155793. [Crossref]
20. Meixuan Teng, Hua Liao, Paul J. Burke, Tianqi Chen, Chen Zhang. 2022. Adaptive responses: the effects of temperature levels on residential electricity use in China. Climatic Change 172:3-4. . [Crossref]
21. Wangyang Lai, Shanjun Li, Yanyan Liu, Panle Jia Barwick. 2022. Adaptation mitigates the negative effect of temperature shocks on household consumption. Nature Human Behaviour 6:6, 837-846. [Crossref]
22. Jens J. Krüger, Moritz Tarach. 2022. Greenhouse Gas Emission Reduction Potentials in Europe by Sector: A Bootstrap-Based Nonparametric Efficiency Analysis. Environmental and Resource Economics 81:4, 867-898. [Crossref]
23. Chris Jeffords. 2022. Fostering Pluralism in an Environmental Economics Course. Sustainability and Climate Change 15:2, 98-103. [Crossref]
24. Marco Bertini, Stefan Buehler, Daniel Halbheer, Donald R. Lehmann. 2022. Carbon Footprinting and Pricing Under Climate Concerns. Journal of Marketing 86:2, 186-201. [Crossref]
25. C. Alestra, G. Cette, V. Chouard, R. Lecat. 2022. Growth impact of climate change and response policies: The advanced climate change long-term (ACCL) model. Journal of Policy Modeling 44:1, 96-112. [Crossref]
26. Larissa Fait, Jens J. Krüger, Moritz Tarach, Heike Wetzel. 2022. Trend Projections of Greenhouse Gas Emission Reduction Potentials: A Bootstrap-Based Nonparametric Efficiency Analysis. SSRN Electronic Journal 27. . [Crossref]
27. Kayla Stan, Graham A. Watt, Arturo Sanchez-Azofeifa. 2021. Financial stability in response to climate change in a northern temperate economy. Nature Communications 12:1. . [Crossref]
28. Robert Vermeulen, Edo Schets, Melanie Lohuis, Barbara Kölbl, David-Jan Jansen, Willem Heeringa. 2021. The heat is on: A framework for measuring financial stress under disruptive energy transition scenarios. Ecological Economics 190, 107205. [Crossref]
29. Sunbin Yoo, Junya Kumagai, Shunsuke Managi. 2021. Challenges and Opportunities in Climate Economics. Frontiers in Climate 3. . [Crossref]
30. Wolfram Schlenker, Charles A. Taylor. 2021. Market expectations of a warming climate. Journal of Financial Economics 142:2, 627-640. [Crossref]
31. Lotanna E. Emediegwu. 2021. Health impacts of daily weather fluctuations: Empirical evidence from COVID-19 in U.S. counties. Journal of Environmental Management 291, 112662. [Crossref]
32.Lucas Costa, André Albuquerque Sant'Anna, Carlos Eduardo Frickmann Young. 2021. Barren lives: drought shocks and agricultural vulnerability in the Brazilian Semi-Arid. Environment and Development Economics 12, 1-21. [Crossref]
33. Mathew Hauer, Valerie Mueller, Glenn Sheriff, Qing Zhong. 2021. More than a nuisance: measuring how sea level rise delays commuters in Miami, FL. Environmental Research Letters 16:6, 064041. [Crossref]
34. Hassan M. Heshmati. Impact of Climate Change on Life . [Crossref]
35. Celso Brunetti, Benjamin Dennis, Dylan Gates, Diana Hancock, David Ignell, Elizabeth K. Kiser, Gurubala Kotta, Anna Kovner, Richard J. Rosen, Nicholas K. Tabor. 2021. Climate Change and Financial Stability. FEDS Notes 2021:2877. . [Crossref]
36. Alfred Endres. Global Warming 1-10. [Crossref]
37. Michael Roos, Franziska M. Hoffart. Importance of Climate Change in Economics 19-33. [Crossref]

38. Rene Aid, Sara Biagini. 2021. Optimal dynamic regulation of carbon emissions market: A variational approach. SSRN Electronic Journal 66. . [Crossref]
39. Shyam Nath, Yeti Nisha Madhoo. Climate Change, Sea Level Dynamics, and Mitigation 185-203. [Crossref]
40.Fengfei Li, Chen Lin, Tse-Chun Lin. 2021. Climate Vulnerability and Corporate Innovation: International Evidence. SSRN Electronic Journal 116. . [Crossref]
41.Banque de France RPS Submitter, Luc Jacolin, Lemaire Thibault. 2021. Climate Change in Developing Countries : Global Warming Effects, Transmission Channels and Adaptation Policies. SSRN Electronic Journal 117. . [Crossref]
42. Juan-Camilo Cárdenas, Fernando Jaramillo, Diana-Carolina Leon, María del Pilar López-Uribe, Mauricio Rodriguez, Hernando Zuleta. 2021. With a Little Help from My Friends: Debt Renegotiation and Climate Change. SSRN Electronic Journal 102. . [Crossref]
43. Edwin Anderson, Ilya Khaykin, Alban Pyanet, Til Schuermann. 2021. Banks and Climate Change Risk. SSRN Electronic Journal 102. . [Crossref]
44. Di Jin, Porter Hoagland, Ken O. Buesseler. 2020. The value of scientific research on the ocean's biological carbon pump. Science of The Total Environment 749, 141357. [Crossref]
45.. Navigating Tough Terrain: Sound Principles, Good Maps, and Adaptive Learning 159-178. [Crossref]
46. Justus Ochieng, Lilian Kirimi, Dennis O. Ochieng, Timothy Njagi, Mary Mathenge, Raphael Gitau, Miltone Ayieko. 2020. Managing climate risk through crop diversification in rural Kenya. Climatic Change 162:3, 1107-1125. [Crossref]
47. Amitrajeet A. Batabyal, Henk Folmer. 2020. Spatial economic aspects of climate change. Spatial Economic Analysis 15:3, 209-218. [Crossref]
48. R. Damania, S. Desbureaux, E. Zaveri. 2020. Does rainfall matter for economic growth? Evidence from global sub-national data (1990–2014). Journal of Environmental Economics and Management 102, 102335. [Crossref]
49. Khouloud Gader, Ahlem Gara, Marnik Vanclooster, Slaheddine Khlifi, Mohamed Slimani. 2020. Drought assessment in a south Mediterranean transboundary catchment. Hydrological Sciences Journal 65:8, 1300-1315. [Crossref]
50. Rita De Siano, Valerio Leone Sciabolazza, Alessandro Sapio. Resilience to Climate Change: Spatial Ricardian Analysis 73-88. [Crossref]
51. Leonardo L. Sta. Romana. Low Carbon Growth: Economic Progress from the Planet’s Perspective 432-441. [Crossref]
52. Joseph Chi, Mathieu Pellerin, Jacobo Rodriguez. 2020. The Economics of Climate Change. SSRN Electronic Journal 100. . [Crossref]
53. Tim Nelson, Owen Pascoe, Prabpreet Calais, Lily Mitchell, Judith McNeill. 2019. Efficient integration of climate and energy policy in Australia’s National Electricity Market. Economic Analysis and Policy 64, 178-193. [Crossref]
54. Graeme Guthrie. 2019. Real options analysis of climate-change adaptation: investment flexibility and extreme weather events. Climatic Change 156:1-2, 231-253. [Crossref]
55. Yann Braouezec, Robert Joliet. 2019. Time to invest in corporate social responsibility and the value of CSR operations: The case of environmental externalities. Managerial and Decision Economics 40:5, 539-549. [Crossref]
56. 2019. Book Reviews. Journal of Economic Literature 57:2, 434-450. [Citation] [View PDF article] [PDF with links]

57. 2019. Book Reviews. Journal of Economic Literature 57:2, 447-449. [Abstract] [View PDF article] [PDF with links]
58. Leonardo L. Sta. Romana. Low Carbon Growth: Economic Progress from the Planet’s Perspective 1-10. [Crossref]
59. Graeme Guthrie. 2019. Real Options Analysis of Climate-change Adaptation: A Simplified Approach. SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
60. Marco Bertini, Stefan Buehler, Daniel Halbheer, Donald R. Lehmann. 2019. Carbon Footprinting and Pricing Under Climate Concerns. SSRN Electronic Journal 54. . [Crossref]
61. Tamma Carleton, Michael Delgado, Michael Greenstone, Trevor Houser, Solomon Hsiang, Andrew Hultgren, Amir Jina, Robert E. Kopp, Kelly McCusker, Ishan Nath, James Rising, Ashwin Rode, Hee Kwon Seo, Justin Simcock, Arvid Viaene, Jiacan Yuan, Alice Tianbo Zhang. 2018. Valuing the Global Mortality Consequences of Climate Change Accounting for Adaptation Costs and Benefits. SSRN Electronic Journal . [Crossref]
62. Peter von zur Muehlen. 2018. Confronting Climate Skepticism: Ramsey Carbon Taxation and Pricing Under Ambiguity. SSRN Electronic Journal 33. . [Crossref]
